Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Number of Reviews
45

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: January 15, 1999
Starring: Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, Elias
Koteas, Nick Nolte, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, John Travolta, George
Clooney
Directed by: Terrence Malick
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Film Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (prolonged sequences of war violence, strong language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/thinredline.htm 
James Jones, one of the major novelists from the middle of the twentieth
century, has written a number of fictional works about the effects of
war on the individual. A veteran of World War II, and a witness to the
Pearl Harbor bombings, his novels are not only grounded in realism but
poetic in nature. They are reminiscent of Stephen Crane in their blunt
eloquence, a trait which lends itself to razor-sharp focus. But perhaps
none matches the scope of his autobiographical novel, THE THIN RED LINE;
now a cinematic masterpiece from director Terrence Malick. 
The book's principal cast, some thirty characters, has been trimmed down
for this rendition, but it still retains its most endearing value. Each
of the roles has an everyman quality, emphasizing Jones' examination of
World War II on the American soldier. There's a definitive chain of
command present, and this also plays on the motivations of the cast. But
most importantly, and perhaps intrinsic to the novel but not to the
movie, a dynamic and effective voice-over is used. Malick has several
characters relating their thoughts, giving the viewer a greater
perspective of the issues at stake. 
The issues at stake are many and one. Told from a limited third-person
perspective (as opposed to a top-down, omniscient view), the movie
entails the struggle of an American infantry company ("C-for-Charlie")
to take a hill during the conflict at Guadalcanal. The South Pacific
island is seen by the top brass as the key position for American armed
forces to hold if they want to win the war. 
And want to win the war they do. In an excellent performance, Nick Nolte
plays C-for-Charlie's commanding officer, Lt. Col. Gordon Tall. He's an
aging soldier who embodies the win-at-all-costs mentality, if only to
impress his superior (John Travolta, in a questionable cameo). This
philosophy is opposite that of Captain Bugger Staros (Elias Koteas), who
dearly values the life of each and every one of the men under his
command. At the front are the privates and corporals (Adrien Brody,
James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, et al), lead by 1st Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn),
who must actually execute the suicide orders handed down to them. 
THE THIN RED LINE is filled with intense, visual poetry, but it's nearly
three hours long. Although the interest level is high throughout the
first two hours, the climax comes forty-five minutes before the end of
the movie; it goes without saying that the movie drags on the back end. 
THE THIN RED LINE will doubtless be compared to 1998's other masterpiece
of war, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN a countless number of times. But to do so is
to belittle both films, for although similarities abound, so do
differences. Director Malick has a story to tell, and for those
interested in listening, this can be a very outstanding movie.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
This film could also have been titled "Deep Thoughts" by Terrence Malick.
The recluse director, who actually beats fellow recluse director Stanley
Kubrick in the number of years elapsed between movies (Malick's last film
was 20 years ago, while Kubrick's only dates back 13), returns to Hollywood
with a solid cast of names, and an attempt to recapture his brilliance from
BADLANDS and DAYS OF HEAVEN.
PLOT:
This film takes place in the Second World War during the Battle of
Guadalcanal. We specifically follow a set of soldiers as they attempt to
break the Japanese stronghold on a giant hill, while listening to their
words of wisdom, and breathing in the lush scenery.
CRITIQUE:
This film may just be the best-looking movie of the year. It may also
contain a solid cast of actors, effective tension when required, and a
life-like feel of being in the bush with the boys. Unfortunately for this
170-minute, overdone, ode to philosophical poetry, this movie just doesn't
muster up enough real interest, plot development or character attachment,
for anyone to give too much of a crap about its existential insights.
There is a reoccurring narration that permeates the entire movie as the
supposed thoughts of the soldiers, which is supposed to make us ponder life,
death and everything in between. All it did for me was tinker the strings of
boredom, as the long pauses between the words had me losing track of most of
what was said, and feel like I was at a poetry hearing, instead of a movie
theater. The last third of the film is especially guilty of this offense, as
the director seemed to have overdosed on his own indulgences, and simply
shot exquisite sceneries, and inserted scattered scenes of the boys and
their apres-winning shenanigans. "Too many vague queries, and not enough
developed thoughts make JoBlo a very uninterested boy."
Acting-wise, this movie is rock-solid, with the lesser named actors pulling
off the best gigs, as Jim Caviezel, Adrien Brody, Ben Chaplin and Elias
Koteas stole the show from the rest of the big names. Within the better
known clique, Nick Nolte jerked off an effective Colonel Tall, with his
grimy impression of a man who lived to bark out orders and thrived on
adversity. And if you're actually thinking of checking into this movie, in
the hopes of seeing your favorite actor, John Travolta or George Clooney, in
action, then I suggest you think thrice about your move, cause they
respectively carry five and one minute screen times in this ocular
air-wafer. All in all, I would say that this film is a visual pearl caught
up in a masturbatory web of overly-profound drivel, which is meant to
stimulate the mind, but ultimately stretches itself too long, and into
indifference. Having said that, the first couple of hours are pretty good,
notably the tense-filled "battle for the hill", and actors solid. So if
you're in the mood for Kierkegaard, I guess this movie might be your
prescribed trip, as long as you don't forget to bring your weed, beret and
"thinker" glasses :)
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actors Lukas Haas and Bill Pullman respectively played the roles of
"Newcomer" and Supply Sgt. MacTae in this film, before their scenes were
deleted by the director during the editing process.
After 1978's DAYS OF HEAVEN, director Terrence Malick apparently split his
time between Paris and Texas, supporting himself with lucrative, although
uncredited, screenwriting assignments. One such assignment had him helping
out the "wonder twins", Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, on their Oscar-winning
script for GOOD WILL HUNTING (7.5/10). Malick went to St. Stephen's high
school in Austin, Texas, where he played football, and then to Harvard. He
was a Rhodes Scholar. In his contract for directing this film, he stated
that no current pictures of him could be published or shown anywhere.
It took the producers ten years to get this story to film. The story rights
were bought from the author's (James Jones) wife in 1988.
Actor Nicolas Cage might also have starred in this film, were it not for a
little mix-up in telephone messages between him and Terrence Malick. The
misunderstanding ultimately left Malick feeling slighted by Cage for not
returning his call, and Cage feeling sorry because he never got the message.
There was a film in 1998 called A SOLDIER'S DAUGHTER NEVER CRIES, which was
a biopic on the life of "A Thin Red Line" novelist James Jones, written by
his daughter, Kaylie.
Although some shooting for this film was actually done in the Guadalcanal
Island, most of the film was shot around Port Douglas in Queensland,
Australia.
The script for this movie was apparently 213 pages long, shot over 123 days,
and held a budget of $50Million.
Actor Elias Koteas was born in my hometown of Montreal, Quebec, Canada.
Actor Jim Caviezel's feature film debut was as an airline clerk in Gus Van
Sant's 1991 film MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO (7.5/10).
Review Date:       February 4, 1999
Director:               Terrence Malick
Writer:                  Terrence Malick (based on novel by James Jones)
Producers:           Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill and John Roberdeau
Actors:                  Nick Nolte as Lieutenant Colonel Gordon Tall, Sean
Penn as First Sergeant Edward Welsh, Elias Koteas as Captain
James Staros, Jim Caviezel as Private Witt, Ben Chaplin as Private Jack
Bell, Adrien Brody as Cpl. Fife
Genre:                   Drama
Year of Release:  1998
---------------------------------------
JoBlo's Movie Emporium
http://www.joblo.com
---------------------------------------
(c) 1999 Berge Garabedian

Author
Michael Summers
Terrence Malick made an excellent 90 minute film adaptation of James Jones' 
World War II novel. Unfortunately, he buried it within an overlong and 
overreaching 3-hour long pseudo-epic. This is a shame because the film 
features an outstanding performance by Nick Nolte. The best scene is when Nick 
Nolte's character, Lt. Col. Tall, is forced to deal with the direct refusal by 
Capt. Staros (Elias Koteas) to execute an order.  Nolte's reaction and 
transformation may be the best work of his career. Had Terrence Malick 
concentrated on the great performances of Nolte and Koteas as well as those by 
Sean Penn, Woody Harrelson, and John Cusack, he could have made a truly great 
film. Instead, Malick saddled the film with plodding pacing, unnecessary 
flashbacks, and a voice-over narration all designed to telegraph the great 
philosophical underpinnings of the story. The narration was especially 
annoying as much of it sounded like very bad high school poetry.  With a lot 
of editing, the core story could be transformed into a truly classic war film. 
Hopefully, the DVD version of this film will feature options to suppress the 
narration, and perhaps will even provide for an alternate, shorter version of 
the film. I give this film two stars out of five.

Author
Kevin Patterson
THE THIN RED LINE
Rating: *** (out of four)
R, 1998
Director: Terrence Malick
Producers: Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill, John Roberdeau
Screenplay: Terrence Malick
Starring Cast: Sean Penn, Nick Nolte, Elias Koteas, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin
THE THIN RED LINE is a sort of grand gesture by director Terrence Malick.
It's a reach for the transcendent arising out of the most horrible
circumstances, namely the brutal fight for Guadalcanal between the
Americans and Japanese in World War II. And this description encapsulates
why THE THIN RED LINE is a good film and also why it's a flawed film. Few
films today, after all, have the courage to reach for the transcendent. Yet
the problem is that it is, indeed, Malick's reach for the transcendent, and
not that of his characters.
Among those characters are Capt. James Staros (Elias Koteas), Private Witt
(James Caviezel), and Private Bell (Ben Chaplin). The latter two probably
receive the most screen time of any of the characters. Witt is a dreamer, a
soldier who has gone AWOL several times, but not, we sense, because he is
afraid of battle so much as he is repulsed by it and is trying to find
something more rewarding in himself and in nature. When a commanding
officer (Sean Penn) lectures him prior to putting him on a squadron headed
for Guadalcanal, he tells him that he'd better straighten up and learn to
live with his situation because "this world is all there is." "I've seen a
different world," Witt replies, and we believe him: the film opens with a
scene of the AWOL Witt living a peaceful life with a tribe of Pacific
Islands natives. Bell has some of Witt's innocence about him as well,
though his personal philosophy is not quite as esoteric. He keeps himself
sane with memories of his loving wife from home, and longs to complete his
military duty and return to her.
THE THIN RED LINE features several battle sequences, all of which are
generally effective in terms of suspense and drama, but what is most
noticeable is the attention devoted to the physical setting of the
battles.. Often, Malick's camera is aimed towards a tribal native walking
past the soldiers as they march to their next assignment, or an animal, or
a wide landscape. The central question of THE THIN RED LINE, often hinted
at in numerous voiceovers, seems to be whether nature is inherently
beautiful or ugly. The answer that Malick seems to come up with is that
it's both, and that while warfare represents the ugly side, those who
engage in it still have the potential to strive for the higher elements.
Malick makes a pariticularly interesting choice by shooting the battle for
Guadalcanal in bright sunlight, with numerous shots of the open hillside.
Rather than stressing the ugly (as in, for example, the D-Day sequence in
Saving Private Ryan, which was shot in a foggy, nebulous gloom), Malick
juxtaposes the beautiful and the ugly, suggesting that they are both parts
of the same larger picture and that they need not be mutually exclusive for
the soldiers.
The problem with THE THIN RED LINE is that it is only coherent if
considered in light of the fact that it is Malick constructing this
picture, over and above the thoughts and observations of the individual
characters. Expressing an abstract idea is a tricky endeavor in the medium
of cinema, which is at its strongest when it captures a human experience in
some way. That doesn't mean that it it's impossible: this summer's PI, for
example, dealt with very esoteric concepts of mathematics and theology, but
it was a more successful film than THE THIN RED LINE because it managed to
pull the audience into its lead character's possibly groundbreaking and
possibly insane quest for knowledge. Whose experience is captured in THE
THIN RED LINE? Mostly that of an outside observer, someone watching but not
participating: this is a film based on a novel, but it feels more like it
was based on a philosophy dissertation. I suppose that the sensibilities of
Private Witt are somewhat in tune with Malick's ideas about humanity and
nature, but even then, it could be argued that Witt does not know how to
deal with the "ugly" side of nature, which is perhaps the reason that he
runs away from it by going AWOL.
That's not to say that Malick treats his characters coldly or
mean-spiritedly, just that he doesn't seem particularly interested in them
as three-dimensional human beings. They're on screen whenever they're
saying or thinking something that is relevant to whatever point he is
trying to make, and then it's on to the next voiceover or the next close-up
on an animal on the ground. It takes a while for the viewer to get all the
characters straight in his or her head, as several of them look alike and
the voiceovers often begin without making it clear whose voice it is. And
while most of the narration and dialogue does seem to fit into Malick's
meditations on human nature, some of it is just puzzling and underrealized.
Captain Staros, for example, isn't developed beyond the fact that he's a
kind-hearted person who genuinely cares about those under his command, and
when his character exits the story, he's given a voiceover about how his
men will "live on inside him" that really has nothing to do with anything
else in the film.
The THE THIN RED LINE is a mild disappointment considering the hype (this
is Malick's first film in twenty years), but it is still a film worth
seeing. The cinematography is nothing short of excellent, and the story and
its thematic elements certainly will not leave the audience bored or
uninterested. Even if this reach for the transcendent doesn't quite achieve
the necessary coherence, I can't help but admire Malick for trying.

Author
Nigel Bridgeman
Starring: Sean Penn, James Caviezel, Elias Koteas & Nick Nolte
Written by: Terrence Malick
Directed by: Terrence Malick
When you see a film which is a true work of art, you know it. Previously, I
knew after watching "Three Colours Red", "Paths of Glory", "Contact" and
"Heat" that I had seen something different, something special, and after
viewing The Thin Red Line I had that feeling all over again. This film -
definately a film, not a mere movie - is a beautiful ode to the futility
and brutality of war, and the effects it has on the human soul and psyche.
It also marks, as everyone should know by now, the return after twenty
years of Terrence Malick to the world of cinema (after seemingly abandoning
it following his critically acclaimed Badlands and Days of Heaven).
The film takes place around the fight for Guadalcanal during World War II
and focuses on a group of men in C Company. Rather than being a collection
of increasingly brutal war scenes, however, The Thin Red Line is more of a
character study as we follow the men as they head on their way to securing
the island from the Japanese or, in the cases of some, dying in the
attempt. The almost-court martialled Witt (James Cavaziel) recently went
AWOL to spend time with the natives of Guadalcanal and has started thinking
about the brutality of human nature; Private Bell (Ben Chaplin) longs for
the wife (Miranda Otto) he left behind; battle-hungry Doll (Dash Mihok)
delights in his first kill; Welsh (Sean Penn) only seems to see the
futility in not only the war but life in general; and Captain Staros (Elias
Koteas, a long way from Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles) is apprehensive about
sending his men onwards in what is obviously a suicide mission.
The performances from Malick's cast are superb. With little-known actors in
the main roles, Malick has done what Curtis Hanson successfully
accomplished with "L.A. Confidential" by making more believable the
characters which the actors play. Cavaziel is fine in what could be
considered the film's lead role, giving an air of innocence and weariness
to Private Witt. Chaplin, as Bell, gives a good performance which is helped
a great deal by the flashbacks and images he has of his wife. Sean Penn's
bitter, defeated Welsh is one of his best roles yet, and
he is excellent without stealing the spotlight from his lesser-known cast
members. Best of all, though, is Nick Nolte as the ambitious Colonel in
charge of the operation. His scene with Koteas, when the latter tells him
that he refuses to follow an order to send his troops against the Japanese
and face certain death, is one of the best of the year.
Much of the discussion that has surrounded Malick's film is the extensive
use of voice-over and the apparent lack of real narrative, especially in
the third hour. I'm not entirely sure if the narrative is really a problem;
Malick doesn't appear to be telling a story so much as letting his
characters discuss with themselves what is going on around them. This isn't
a film about a war, this is a film about war itself.
It must be said that nothing much in the way of action actually happens in
the final year, but nothing happens brilliantly. John Toll, who failed to
really impress me with his Oscar-winning cinematography in "Legends of the
Fall" and "Braveheart", beautifully captures the mayhem and slaughter of
the battle scenes on the island, as well as the serene moments away from
the carnage. This is photography which has to be seen to be believed.
Other technical aspects of the film are also excellent. The battle scenes
are at least on par with those from 1998's other WWII epic, "Saving Private
Ryan", and just as disturbing and enthralling. As with Spielberg's film,
the editing and sound crew have come into their own here, showing what film
as a medium is all about; it's not just great performances, screenplays and
direction that are important in the craft of filmmaking but the less
obvious, behind-the-scenes crew which help make cinema great without even
being noticed by the average moviegoer.
Malick has created a work of art which will not be fully appreciated by the
masses who expect "Saving Private Ryan" in the Pacific. The Thin Red Line
demands a great deal from the audience, and if people are willing to do
some thinking for themselves they should be able to fully appreciate what
Malick has created; something that embodies everything there is about film.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
THE THIN RED LINE
Cast: Sean Penn, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, Elias Koteas, Nick Nolte,
Adrien Brody, Jared Leto, Dash Mihok
Director: Terrence Malick
Screenplay: Terrence Malick based on the novel by James Jones
Australian theatrical release: January 18, 1999
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
3 and a half stars
If you could imagine Quentin Tarantino refusing to make another film
after Reservoir Dogs and Pulp Fiction, you can understand why Hollywood
is fussing over the return of Terrence Malick.  Malick performed one of
the industry's greatest disappearing acts; his last film was made in
1978 and he has since been absent from the directors chair.  But now in
the cinema, when the lights dim and The Thin Red Line reels through the
projector, not much has changed.  This visionary director has not lost
any of his confidence or energy, but seems not to know exactly how to
channel them.  As much as Steven Spielberg told in Saving Private Ryan,
some of the film's power came from the things he didn't tell.  To
Malick's credit, The Thin Red Line is one of the most poetic and
extraordinary films likely to be released this year; but to his
condemnation, it fails to maintain a steady pace and a consistently
absorbing atmosphere.  But on a visual level, this film is beautifully
textured, and it has enough moving moments to make all of its
frustrations bearable.
The Thin Red Line could certainly be described as "experimental."
Ingeniously, Malick informs us that something is not quite right through
powerful imagery.  The film opens with a shot of a crocodile gliding
beneath algae-covered water; later, that same crocodile is shown tied up
and teased by a group of soldiers.  Feral dogs feast on dead bodies.
The face of a dead Japanese man is shown buried in mud; bringing to mind
that perhaps the enemy is not a distant race of people, perhaps the
enemy is ourselves. Soldiers contemplate what part of humanity could
possibly create something as dreadful as war.  Some find war as a test
of bravery and courageousness; others just want to get out of it alive.
When The Thin Red Line touches on these themes of mortality and human
nature, it achieves something that Saving Private Ryan never really did:
powerful metaphorical expressions.  When a film is able to draw emotion
from simply using representation, though, it usually will sacrifice
something to get there.  In the case of The Thin Red Line, a coherent
story is nothing more than an afterthought.
The film is based on a novel of the same name written by James Jones,
which tells the story of a group of men fighting during World War II in
the Pacific.  Brave troublemaker Witt (Jim Caviezel) fantasizes about a
different world, a "paradise" where peace dominates.  Bell (Ben Chaplin)
finds energy to fight from his visions of his wife back home.  Sergeant
Edward Welsh (Sean Penn) is a focused and courageous hard-knocker whose
views on war are as negative as they come.  Lieutenant Colonel Gordon
Tall (Nick Nolte) is intent on winning even if it means losing many
lives to achieve it.  These men and many others like them are forced to
bond together, to overcome the many distressing and life-threatening
scenarios they encounter.
I guess the major selling point for The Thin Red Line (apart from its
seven Oscar nominations) is the star-studded cast, which features some
of the world' s awesome talents.  Sean Penn is particularly memorable,
and plays his complex character with appropriate authority, and a subtle
love for the lives of Welsh's men occasionally shines through. Jim
Caviezel is fine, and Nick Nolte looked like he was going to burst a
vein at any moment - his character is an arrogant authoritarian, and he
plays the part well.  I found it hard to accept that John Travolta and
George Clooney were cast; they both have insignificant small roles that
serve as distractions to the story.  Travolta especially looks
ridiculous wearing what looks like a Mr Potato Head moustache.
For all its faults, The Thin Red Line is much more than just another
average World War II movie.  Some occasions in the film feature
voice-overs from the cast (this reminded me of Wim Wender's Wings of
Desire), in which they philosophize about the nature of war.  Often,
Terrence Malick finds power and poignancy in these moments.  The lush
jungle environments in the background aid these scenes incredibly,
making them not just powerful, but powerful and beautiful.  Out of the
norm and unpredictable, The Thin Red Line is often so gratifying that
its many lesser moments become huge letdowns.
While watching this film, Malick intends viewers to search for meaning
in war, but no doubt more people will be searching for meaning in
Malick's direction.  A picture can indeed tell a thousand words, but it
often feels like The Thin Red Line has a thousand too many pictures (a
170 minute running time is just a little too hard to fathom, especially
when the film often feels like it is going nowhere).  This is definitely
a hard movie to make a call on, but The Thin Red Line's absence of plot
makes it an easy target.  Malick ponders about his material and the plot
meanders along, not knowing exactly where he wants to end up, but
nonetheless carves some tragic and frightfully realistic images.  The
great thing is, his pondering is fascinating to watch, even if it is a
little inconsistent.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        As a freelance film critic, my schedule is often pushed to the
point of overload with the sheer quantity of movies that I'm called
upon to see each month.  Pen in hand, I approach each of them as a
lion might stalk its prey: analyzing, looking for weakness.  Try as I
might, I'm sometimes unable to prevent myself from focusing more on
the individual details of a cinematic work, rather than the overall
experience and tone that it creates.  I recognize this as perhaps my
biggest failing; after re-reading some of my older reviews last week,
I noticed that I often judge a film's merit based on the way a few
choice scenes move me (or don't move me, as the case may be).  I'm
trying to be more objective these days, but I suppose it's human
nature to occasionally toss aside the big picture because of emotional
intervention.  Heaven knows I do it all the time in my day-to-day
life.
        I'm not sure, but I'm betting that director Terrence Malick
approaches filmmaking the same way.  With his latest offering, the
World War II epic "The Thin Red Line," Malick crafts together a
stunning piece of cinema that seems heavily rooted in the individual
moment rather than an overall 'big picture' or plot line; indeed,
conventional narrative storytelling is tossed cheerfully out the
window in service to the *scene*.  Seemingly unimportant details are
given ample (some would say excessive) screen time, as moments which
have no apparent relevence to the story are followed via lengthy
tangents.  These nuances build, however, into an intricate mosaic of
feelings and images over the course of the tale's three-hour running
time.  In a way, I was reminded of the illusionary pictures which
often adourn the walls of waiting rooms: look at one up close and you
see a group of small, individual pictures.... but stand back a bit and
the images mesh together to form a completely different visual.
        Divided into three distinct acts, the movie unfolds itself as
we chronicle several weeks in the lives of a group of American
soldiers during World War II.  Through the incredible hardships they
are forced to endure, they grow from strangers to friends, and finally
into a strange type of family, headed up by the fierce Lt. Col. Gordon
Tall (an excellent performance by Nick Nolte), who is so militantly
delighted to be in a real war that he looks as though he might burst
into song at any moment.  War's biggest inconvienence for Private Bell
(Ben Chaplin) is the separation from his wife; his devotion to her is
as sweet and selfless as any woman could ever hope to have.  Woody
Harrelson is brash and impetuous as Sgt. Keck, yet Sean Penn's
portrayl of Sgt. Welsh is mature and weary-- a man who has seen his
share of war and death, and just wants it all to be over.
        Malick has inflicted the film with the visual poetry of which
he is justly famous.  Natural landscapes have rarely been as well
photographed as they are here, and his creative use of natural
lighting and shadows add much to the mood.  And by giving us a
"soldier's-eye" view for much of the picture, he effectively draws us
into the events our characters experience.  Unlike "Saving Private
Ryan," which used hand-held, documentary-style photography during its
combat scenes, Malick wisely chooses to involve us in the characters'
fear by effectively making us one of them, via the camera.  The
Japanese soldiers are as much a faceless stranger to the audience as
they are to our heroes-- during the combat scenes, we never get a
glimpse of the faces of any of "the enemy."  Only later are we able
to realize that they too are people, just as unhappy to be fighting as
our protaganists are.  One of the film's most unshakeable images
involves a dead Japanese soldier, face half-buried in the mud, open
eyes gazing mournfully towards Heaven, as if demanding accountability
from God.
        "The Thin Red Line" also breaks conventions by taking us
inside the minds of our main characters, revealing their thoughts to
us via poetic voice-overs as war explodes around them.  The
disenchanted Private Witt (James Caviezel), for example, muses about
the futility of war during the film's opening montage.  "I've heard
people talk about immortality," he thinks.  "But I ain't seen it."
Private Bell's thoughts of his wife are all that keep him going;
whenever things get too stressful for him, he flashes back to happier
days.  Malick allows us to travel back with him, and we better
understand the sense of loss he feels at her absence.
        "The Thin Red Line" never allows its characters (or the
audience) to bask in the glory and bravada which usually marks this
type of picture; war isn't glamorous, and Malick knows it.  We're also
not permitted to think that man's actions have no consequences on the
innocent, either: countless soldiers are mowed down by Japanese
gunfire and we barely pause for a moment to register the image... but
when a bird is caught in the crossfire, its dying moments are shown to
us for an excruciatingly long time before the camera mercifully cuts
away.  The most overwhelming image for me: the shot of two stray dogs
casually nibbling on the bloody dead soldiers which cover the hills.
This image is surely as chilling as any I've seen in a war movie, and
conveys a much different kind of horror from bombs and bullets.  It's
a jarring, disturbing visual... but fits into the film so well, so
*rightly*, that its presence cannot be questioned.
        This film was destined (cursed?) by its reputation even before
the first trailer was released, if only because of its director.
Commonly referred to as "the J.D. Salinger of modern cinema," Terrence
Malick returned to the film world after a twelve-year absence from
behind the camera to helm this project.  Already a legend based on his
first two critically-adored films, "Badlands" and "Days of Heaven,"
Malick has created not so much a film as a piece of visual poetry.
With "The Thin Red Line," he stirs the soul and the imagination, shows
us scenes of unparalled beauty interspersed between others of
unimaginable horror, and manages to make us feel and ponder what the
people on the screen are going through, even hours after leaving the
theater.  I haven't been able to shake the experience viewing this
work, and I hope I never do.
        Put simply, "The Thin Red Line" is a masterpiece, woven
together so deftly by the actors and director that its seams are never
visible through the cinematic cloth, allowing the images to service
one of cinema's greatest virtues: its ability to transport the
audience.  There are those who say the film is too long, and call the
"thought monologues" delivered by the characters distracting and
nothing more than poor attempts at introspection.  They suggest the
work could be made stronger via judicious pruning of its slower
passages.  I respectfully disagree.  One of the reasons I thought the
film worked so well was the simple fact that it *did* take the time to
show the monotony and tedium of combat, rather than non-stop
excitement and trauma.  It's a decision that, for me, made the film
rise far above the typical war movie.  To cut one frame from this film
would be to slash away a corner of the "Mona Lisa" or "The Last
Supper."  This film is not about sprightly pacing, and those who
complain about its length have, I fear, missed the point entirely.
"The Thin Red Line" is Art, with a capital "A," and is meant to be
experienced, not watched with an eye on one's wristwatch.
         This movie was released in certain parts of the country in
December of 1998, but didn't open nationwide until last Friday, which
is the same day that I saw it.  It's a pity my city (Raleigh, NC)
didn't get it earlier; had I seen this before my December 30th voting
deadline, I would've unhesitatingly named "The Thin Red Line" as my
top film of 1998.  As it stands, the film will have to be content with
gaining admitance to my inner circle of favorite movies, a short list
with also includes "Star Wars," "Schindler's List," "Casablanca" and a
small handful of others.  Be warned before you head to the theater,
however: this is not a movie concerned with taking your hand and
gently pulling you through a simplistically violent plot.  It's about
the sharing of experiences, visual grace, stunning camera work, and
the madness that mankind is capable of inflicting upon itself and
others.  This is a completely new kind of filmmaking-- it's not afraid
to delve into internal rationality, long passages of photographic
splendor, or slower moments which have absolutely no relevence to the
film's storyline, but which nonetheless add depth and shading to the
events and emotions being depicted on the screen.  This unusual
deviation from the norm, I suspect, is the very reason that so many
critics have fallen in love with the movie while so many viewers are
befuddled by it.  Adjust your expectations accordingly, then go see
what all the fuss is about.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Neil Smith
With Saving Private Ryan being my candidate as the best movie so far for
1998, it was with some eagerness I was looking forward to seeing the other
Second World War Two epic nominated in the Best Picture Oscar category.
Having now seen both movies it is clear to me who the winner is going to be
now that the canon smoke has cleared. Is it Steven Speilberg's Normandy
landing based movie or Terrence Malick's jungle based movie.
And the winner is  Saving Private Ryan. And for many reasons which I will
touch on as I continue my review. This is not to say The Thin Red Line is a
bad movie. Far from it. The Thin Red Line is one of the best stream of
consciousness movies I have ever seen. The lovely jungle scenery, the voice
over narration contemplating what death might be like and the stresses of
combat clearly etched in the faces of the combatants, gives this movie an
otherworldly dreamlike experience unlike any other. I also read the James
Jones based novel on which the movie is based only a scant few months ago.
So for me the characters from this unforgettable novel is still very fresh
in my mind. Whether this is an aide to enjoying the movie or not is hard to
say. At least I had perhaps a clearer understanding about the soldiers'
journey of discovery they were going through. Obviously as with so many
book-to-movies the whole books plot was almost thrown away, and only the
bare basics survived. The main character in the movie had only a bit part in
the book. In the book Cpl. Fife who we hardly see in the movie was more or
less the books main voice. Also overlooked was Pvt. Jack Bell rapid rise
from ex-lieutenant to private back up to lieutenant. Also strange was the
exclusion of the final village battle after the walk along the river as
Charlie Company becomes unstoppable in the forward advances. And we only get
the mere mention of the word "property" which is the whole lifes philosophy
of company First Sgt. Edward Welsh. For me the first two thirds of The Thin
Red Line was the best. The hour long build up to the battle for the hill and
then the battle itself. There is a superb building up period to the eventual
test of fire these ordinary men have to go through after which their lives
will never be the same again.
The battle scenes themselves don't match the sheer raw power of Saving
Private Ryan nor is it as gruesomely bloody and realistic. I think the main
reason for this could have been because Terrence Mallick lacks Steven
Speilbergs mastery of special effects. And obviously it has been twenty
years since his last moive. With all of today's digital technology at his
disposal, Speilberg was able to make us truly believe we are in the midst of
a war for ourselves. Saving Private Ryan also had more identifiable
characters and a better plot, rudimentary as it was. The Thin Red line on
the other hand has more name actors, who unfortunately are more an
distraction than a help. John Travolta and George Clooneys two second speech
at the end of the movie serves no real purpose. Nick Nolte is superb though,
as the obsessed colonel who knows he is taking part in the last ever war he
will have a chance to participate in. For him it is all about objectives
taken and how many lives can be spent to accomplish this. It is all a
numbers game to him, like for any good accountant as long as his gains
outweighs his losses he is doing good business.
Pvt. Witt the movies main character is well played by James Caviezel. One
has real empathy for his character. Here is someone who has gone AWOL a
number of times but now that he is in the thick of things is willing to
volunteer himself for the most suicidal of missions.
War of all about contradictions. We profess to be peace seeking individuals
but when we are offered an excuse we will kill, maim and destroy to the
fullest of our ability to place ourselves ahead of the enemy. With such
inherent duality evident in all men, it is no wonder that wars are still
being fought every day around the globe and fanatics will find any excuse to
inflict their harmful will upon others for some misguided cause or the
other. In the end it is about he who holds the biggest stick who will win.
Look at the United States the worlds only remaining superpower. The US is
supposed to be this huge peace loving nation but doesn't hesitate to impose
it will on others via smart bombs and Tomahawk missiles. I guess when you
are the number one power in the world you have to flex your muscles from
time to time as to discourage other from picking fights with you
unnecessarily.
Anyway, excuse main lapse of concentration. Go see The Thin Red Line if you
like challenging movie experiences.
Neil Smith
Review courtesy of www.megavideo.co.za as well as www.dvdsa.co.za

Author
Matt Williams
A study in pretension, The Thin Red Line marks the infamously reclusive
director Terrence Malick's anticlimactic return to the cinema.  On the
surface, the film is a war movie, based on the James Jones novel of the
same name.  But, this film has no real interest in telling a war story
at all. Instead, the film embarks on an artsy philosophical journey to
discover the soul, a journey so long and painful that one might prefer
the war itself.
The closest thing the film has to a central character is one Private
Witt (Jim Caviezel).  At the opening of the film, he and another soldier
have gone AWOL to live in a virtual Eden with some islanders.  However,
Witt is soon captured and sent into the Battle of Guadalcanal.
A few other stories intertwine throughout the film's wanderings. Private
Bell (Ben Chaplin) pines for his wife back home.  Lt. Colonel Tall (Nick
Nolte) is eager for a battle.  Captain Staros (Elias Koteas) doesn't
share his commanding officer's bloodlust, and searches for a better way
to use his men.
But, intermingled with the war (and sometimes overlaid on top of it),
the soldiers (turned poet-philosophers) contemplate eternal questions of
life.  Is mankind apart from nature or a part of it?  Where does evil
come from?  Is war a natural phenomenon?  What is the nature of the
soul?  And other, similarly pretentious, unanswerable questions are
posed with regularity throughout the film.
The Thin Red Line is actually composed of two separate films that try,
but are never able, to merge into a complete whole.  There's the
traditional war story on one hand, delivering the overly familiar scenes
of nervous soldiers heading to battle and plunged into the hellish
thicket of combat.  The other film is a puffed-up philosophical National
Geographic piece.  Lingering shots of wildlife, the local flora and
fauna, and the idyllic lives of the Melanesian islanders intertwine with
portentous philosophical ramblings.  Though the two films are thoroughly
intercut and overlaid, there's never a sense that one relates to the
other.  Would these soldiers be thinking these thoughts?  No...it sounds
much more like the self-important words a screenwriter might dream up
than an epiphany discovered on the field of battle.
As was likely intended, most of the characters in the film blend
together (in an attempt to show the face of the every-soldier). A few
faces are distinctive, but aside from the wildly out of place (and
thankfully brief) cameos by stars such as John Travolta, George Clooney
and Woody Harrelson, only a few are memorable.  And those memorable ones
are poorly used.  Sean Penn's Sergeant Welsh, for example, is played
with intensity, but with no purpose.  Though the characters are
constantly in jeopardy, you don't really care.  In fact, the film is
orchestrated in such a way to distance the audience from even knowing or
caring about them at all.
On the bright side, The Thin Red Line boasts some very gorgeous imagery.
Shots of nature and shots of war are all examine for their inner beauty.
Unfortunately, by the umpteenth time we are shown a shot of the sunlight
filtering down through the trees, you simply wish the film would hurry
up and get over with.
Neither half of The Thin Red Line is overly bad by itself. However, the
convergence of the two creates a nightmare. Too self-important and vague
for war film lovers, and too grounded and mundane for art film devotees,
The Thin Red Line will fail to please nearly everyone.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of nearly 700 reviews, and information on over 750 upcoming
releases

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Twentieth Century Fox/ Phoenix Pictures
 Director:  Terrence Malick
 Writer:  Terrence Malick, novel by James Jones
 Cast: George Clooney, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, Nick
Nolte, Sean Penn, Bill Pullman, John Travolta, Adrien Brody,
Ben Chaplin, Jim Caviezel, Elias Koteas
   Whatever happened to those seedy old black-and-white
war movies that came out during World War 2?  As a little kid
who was way too young to fight during the early 1940s I used
to love going to the neighborhood theater for a double feature
of high-action heroics, to cheer on each time an American
plane knocked out a "zero" and to laugh at the Japanese--all
portrayed as cartoonish characters in their round glasses who
had one word vocabularies: "Bonzai! Bonzai!"   My friends
and I were practically babies when we took in the dauntless
deeds of our fighting men, and we were not about to believe
that real people were over there getting maimed and killed
nor did we have much interest in the geopolitics.  There was
virtually no character development, but who cared?
   For all its wonderful battle scenes, not even Steven
Spielberg's masterly "Saving Private Ryan" examined
character all that much, though it did explore the rationale
behind risking eight lives to free one surviving family member
from the dangers on the front.  "The Thin Red Line" is
another story.  When Terrence Malick, who helmed
"Badlands" in 1973 (a moody thriller inspired by the
Starkweather-Fugate killing spree in the 50s) and "Days of
Heaven" in 1978 (yet another mood-piece, visually beautiful,
about a love triangle) came back to direct his first movie in
twenty years, he must have connected with something.  His
notice must have been held by the opportunity to address a
story with a moody ambiance similar to what he built in his
previous films.
   "The Thin Red Line" is his version of the sprawling epic of
action on one island, Guadalcanal, during World War II. 
Freely tossing in phrases from James Jones's 1962 novel, he
sees the action from the point of view of the narrator, Private
Witt (James Caviezel), who went AWOL from his unit several
times to share his life with the Melanesian natives in the
Solomon Islands chain.  We learn early on that the island is
of strategic importance to the Japanese because it could
provide them with access to Australia and to the sea lanes to
America.  With Japanese entrenched on a part of the island,
on which they have already built an airstrip, the American
forces were given the mission of dislodging them and taking
control of Guadalcanal.
   Cinematogapher John Toll has done an amazing job of
capturing the raw natural beauty of the terrain of Queensland,
Australia, which was the site of much of the filming--though a
part of the photography takes place on location in
Guadalcanal.  The gorgeous topography is the home of a
variety of exquisitely colored birds and mammals of various
ilks, including some spooky-looking bats and scary alligators--
who enjoy the perpetually bright, sunny days as much as the
local people.  Toll captures the peaceful lives of the
indigenous clans, whose youngsters play calmly on the beach
and never fight the way westerners are wont to do.  In only
one case do we see the adults squabble, though they appear
leery of the Americans at first, neither welcoming them as
liberators nor expressing any hostility toward them.  
   Beauty aside, the real purpose of the film is to capture the
meditations of some of the fighting men, principally those of
Private Witt and of Private Bell (Ben Chaplin), the latter
frequently contemplating the far more pleasant times when he
is making love with his fetching wife back home.  When the
principals are not meditating, they are philosophizing verbally,
trading viewpoints and acting out their convictions in the way
they command the men.  Chief among the views are those of
Private Witt, who, examining the peaceful vistas provided by
nature, wonders what propels men to war.  He is answered
by Colonel Tall (Nick Nolte) who sees instead that the vines
wrap themselves around one another as though on a mission
to choke the life out of the shrubbery.  Sgt. Welsh (Sean
Penn) comes out with his belief that "there's no world but this
one," that we should simply accept our assignments and
duties and go on living as best we can with our obligations.
   The assaults by the Japanese are enacted realistically, the
chief action being an attmept by the Americans to dislodge a
machine-gun nest which is taking all too many lives.  There
are moments of high tension within the U.S. unit, particularly
when Captain Staros (Elias Koteas) directly refuses an order
by Col. Tall to take a hill even while Tall knows the capture
would involve the loss of many men.  
   Despite the National Geographic-style beauty throughout
and some credible if not overly striking battle scenes, "The
Thin Red Line" depends too much on its narrative, a series of
reflections and philosophic attitudes that would be better
absorbed and appreciated on James Jones's pages than on
Terrence Malick's staging.   Malick has utilized the names of
a great many major performers--John Travolta, Woody
Harrelson, George Clooney, John Cusack--in cameos that are
so brief we can't help thinking he employed these men only
for their value on the theater marquees.  Their roles could
easily have been assumed by extras and, in fact, one of the
less-known performers in this movie, James Caviezel, is so
convincing (and handsome) that we wonder how some of the
more alpha males from Hollywood were able to swallow up
such superior thesps.  If "The Thin Red Line" did not open in
a year that included Steven Spielberg's magnum opus on
World War II, it would deserve more serious attention by the
Academy.  While it remains a powerful work with the
signature moodiness or its director, its chief asset is that it
may encourage us to reach for the novel.

Author
James Brundage
Written and Directed by Terrence Malick (Badlands)
Based upon the novel by James Jones ("From Here to Eternity")
Starring Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, Ben Chaplin, John Cusask, Woody Harrelson,
Elais Koteas, Jared Leto, Dash Mihok, Tim Blake Nelson, Nick Nolte, John C.
Reilly, Larry Romano, John Savage, Arie Verveen, David Harrod, Thomas Jane,
Miranda Otto, Jim Caviezel
Featuring, in cameos, John Travolta and George Clooney.
I will address the first question first.  Everyone ahs asked, how does The
Thin Red Line compare with the other epic war film of 1998, Saving  Private
Ryan.  I address it by saying this: they are not to be compared.  They are
too different to even be considered competitors.  Under my advisement, I
would recommend that you watch Saving Private Ryan and then The Thin Red
Line.  One will sack you with a visceral image of war, and the other will
give you a means to comprehend the massive onslaught of emotion the first
did without allowing you to forget.
The Thin Red Line follows C-for-"Charlie" company during the battle of
Guadacanal.  The reason the cast is as epic as the 6-hour-director's-cut
(the final movie is 3 hours) is that not one character is focused on much
more than any others.  All of them are given fairly equal screen time, with
a difference of perhaps ten or twenty minutes for a couple of people.
There are five people that are followed more than any other, and those would
be Capt. James "Bugger" Staros (Elias Koteas), First Sgt. Edward Welsh (Sean
Penn), Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (Nick Nolte), Pvt. Bell (Ben Chaplin) and Pvt.
Witt (Jim Caviezel).  These five, consequently, are the primary narrators of
the story.  Not a single scene exists where one of them is not present.
To truly describe the complexity of The Thin Red Line, I would need an
academic paper.  This review, I will warn you now, will be insufficient.
The same is true of my review of Saving Private Ryan.
One thing to be honestly said about The Thin Red Line is that it is a film
of images.  From the horror of a dying bird shot by a stray bullet to the
beauty of a fern closing at a soldier's touch, The Thin Red Line rivals The
Sweet Hereafter in precious visual complexity.  As I called it shortly
after, The Thin Red Line is a poetry of images.
Another thing that you can honestly say is that The Thin Red Line is
uniquely contemplative.  In the pauses that come in the battle, both you and
the characters take time to reflect upon what you just saw.  You do not,
however, prepare yourself for what happens next.
The Thin Red Line may nab a couple of nominations that Saving Private Ryan
doesn't.  One is for Best Supporting Actor, which may very well go to Nick
Nolte for playing the career-motivated Lt. Col. Gordon Tall who, until he
has seen the death his armies inflict and receive firsthand, does not even
truly realize that men are dying.  Another possible nomination, although
someone with so few speaking lines will most likely not get it would be for
Best Supporting Actress, Miranda Otto.
Miranda Otto plays Marty Bell, the woman you see on the swing in the
commercials.  Wife of one of the two truly important characters, Private
Bell (Ben Chaplin) and Private Witt (Jim Caviezel), Miranda Otto gives a
heart-stopping performance as the wife of a soldier at war.
Private Bell gives a much better performance as the husband at war, down in
the grit and fighting it.  A former officer in the corps of engineers, he is
a demonstration of how the military command itself may well be the only
villain in this film.  He quit the corps of engineers to be with his wife,
only to be promised by the military that he would be drafted and he would
become an infantryman.  Lost in the dark, murders world of Guadacanal that
Terrance Malick so aptly shows, Private Bell is forced to moor himself to a
wife he cannot see in order to retain his sanity, to not cross the thin red
line.
The thin red line, as told according to James Jones, is the line between man
and beast.  It is the point where you cease to recognize a difference
between killing a human and killing an animal, and thus kill with the same
sociopathic lack of concern.
Private Bell and Private Witt are the only people that do not cross the thin
red line.  Everyone else, in the horror of battle, crosses at some time or
another.
The scene at which everyone but Bell and Witt cross is a perfectly filmed
attack on a Japanese hilltop encampment.  Lasting about the half the
duration as the recreation of D-Day in Saving Private Ryan, I would venture
that this scene is more effective.
This scene is set to music composed by Hanz Zimmer, music sure to score him
a nomination and, hopefully, the win for Best Original Score.  This music,
increasing steadily in both volume and tempo, sets the pace for both that
attack itself and the violence towards the victims.  Using that same mastery
of images that Malick displays through the entirety of the film, people are
placed as to show the sorrow of the moment much more than Saving Private
Ryan ever accomplished.
This scene greets you with the sight of a meditating soldier, who prays as
the world literally goes to hell around him.  It also shows a hospital's
patients being killed in mass of fury, in retaliation to the deaths during
the initial offensive.  The most striking item, however, is the image of a
private removing the teeth of dead Japanese, and contemplating removing the
teeth of a living one, for the purpose of their gold.  This, of course, was
used in Schindler's List to denote the inhuman nature of Nazis, and is
equally effective here.
Private Witt is the final statement in both the film and the review.  The
only person to retain all sanity through the film, Witt is a repeated AWOL
who returns to the company shortly before the battle.  A deeply religious
man, Witt is placed to counter Sean Penn, an atheist, but develops his own
character.  He has lived among the natives but, in the film's most powerful
statement, is not allowed to return when the battle is over.  He is Army.
He is American.  He is, in their eyes, death.
The film suffers one major pitfall that, until I wrote this review, I
thought was much more serious than it actually was.  After the hilltop is
taken there is a half-hour pause in the film.  Each line implies a fadeout,
and it is still an hour until it is given.  I realize now that this is the
point which allowed me, and should allow you, to analyze the intense two
hours you have just witnessed.
Oh, yes.  You haven't witnessed it yet.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Terrence Malick.
Cast: Sean Penn, Jim Caviezal, Ben Chaplin, Nick Nolte, Elias Koteas, 
John Cusack, Adrien Brody, Woody Harrelson, John C. Reilly, Miranda 
Otto, John Travolta, Dash Mihok, David Harrod, Nick Stahl, George 
Clooney.
1998 - 166 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, gore, profanity, brief nudity, and sexual 
situations).
Reviewed January 21, 1999.
Terrence Malick, widely regarded as one of the most visually stunning 
film directors of all time, made two films in the '70s, "Badlands" and 
"Days of Heaven," respectively, and then completely vanished for many 
years. His first film in twenty years, "The Thin Red Line," set during 
World War II, is like no other war picture I have ever seen; one of 
extraordinary beauty that goes beyond the norm of simply setting up 
characters and battles (even those the film does have these) and into a 
plain of astonishing metaphysics.
In a surprising turn from a regular movie set during a war which usually 
begins in the depths of a battle, "The Thin Red Line" starts out with an 
unidentified man (Jim Caviezal) gently walking around and observing a 
Melanesian village, where the natives all appear to be in a state of 
deep harmony. As I watched this striking prologue, the film really was 
able to fill me with a strange feeling of inner peace, especially in a 
small, moving scene where he has a warm conversation with one of the 
female natives who is holding her tired, young child. Eventually, this 
peaceful tranquility is interrupted with an oncoming war ship, and we 
discover that the man is actually the AWOL soldier, Private Witt, who is 
being picked up by his gruff commanding officer, Lieutenant Colonel Tall 
(Nick Nolte), and Sergeant Welsh (Sean Penn). The ship is headed for 
Guadalcanal, and soon we are placed directly in the middle of the 
infamous battle, where the soldiers alternate through voice narration in 
pondering some of their deepest thought about their lives and human 
nature, in general.
Due to the timing of the film, comparisons are inevitable between "The 
Thin Red Line" and last summer's "Saving Private Ryan," although they 
are actually quite different in style. While "Saving Private Ryan" 
contained graphic battle scenes, the film itself was undoubtedly more 
mainsteam and accessible for regular audiences, due to its neatly 
written characters and story, as well as the occasionally 
oversentimental emotions (after the success of "Patch Adams," I have 
realized how much most Americans love corny, melodramatic situations). 
"The Thin Red Line," on the other hand, plays like a lyrical poem, much 
more meditative and thought-provoking in its ideas and treatment. Not 
only that, but even though it is not as bloody as "...Ryan," I found 
myself much more enthralled with this picture, particularly in its 
reflective storytelling techniques and seemingly more realistic overall 
depiction of war.
"The Thin Red Line" has been almost unanonymously acclaimed by critics, 
but it has been seldomly criticized for its use of narration, which is 
said throughout the film by eight different characters, telling us their 
personal thoughts. Some critics object to the scholarly and overtly 
mature thoughts that are swarming in the soldiers' heads, which I find 
to be a rather offensive complaint towards those who have ever fought in 
a war. The truth is that humans naturally have many, many thoughts 
constantly in their minds, and I find it wholly believable that people 
under such life-threatening circumstances would think and question 
themselves about things of such importance and meaning.
For a large majority of its almost three-hour running time, "The Thin 
Red Line" is set in the midst of the battle of Guadalcanal, and it is 
here that we get to know the wide array of characters. Terrence Malick 
acquired a huge cast of people, both known and unknown, and it was only 
in the editing room that he structured the film, while trying to cut a 
rumored million feet of film down to three hours. Because of this, 
previously expected storylines were completely dropped and some cast 
members totally disappeared from the final cut, such as Bill Pullman and 
Lukas Haas. Regardless of this fact, and the unorthodox way that the 
characters enter and exit the picture without much of an introduction or 
farewell, I was pleasantly surprised that I still was able to get to 
know the people, even if it only was from body language or subtle 
observation. Ben Chaplin is, perhaps, the most effective in the cast as 
a soldier who often is reminiscing about his angelic wife (Miranda Otto) 
back home. As Witt, Jim Caviezal also makes an impression due to his 
brilliant performance in the opening section set at the Melanesian 
village. After "Affliction," Nick Nolte does another high-powered turn 
as the always-hollering Lt. Col. Tall, and obviously put his heart and 
soul (as well as his voice box) into the role. Finally, Woody Harrelson 
is heartbreaking as the doomed Sergeant Keck, and Elias Koteas 
poignantly portrays the scared and confused Capt. James Staros, who 
fears risking the lives of his men when ordered to ascend farther up the 
hill upon the Japanese enemies. The only flaw in the cast (and it isn't 
the actor's fault) is George Clooney, who appears right at the end and 
comes off as an example of pointless casting in order to get another 
"big name" star.
Coming away from "The Thin Red Line," I was not only struck by the 
intriguing questions the film brings up, but also the unforgettable 
images that appear throughout. As a visual stimulant, the recent "In 
Dreams" and this film certainly do the trick unlike anything else I've 
seen in a long time. As the camera gracefully moves among the giant, 
swaying blades of grass, the film causes you to feel like you have 
physically entered into the exotic setting. Other images of equal 
pulchritude include the shots of the sun gleaming through the trees; the 
bamboo stalks blowing in the wind; an alligator slowly descending into 
the depths of a river; and a fatally wounded baby chick wrestling around 
on the ground for dear life. For a mainstream audience used to 
conventional fare, "Saving Private Ryan" will most likely seem superior 
in their eyes because this film is more deliberately paced. However, for 
those viewers interested in a phenomenally more challenging piece of 
work, "The Thin Red Line" is the way to go. Along with Oliver Stone's 
"Platoon," "The Thin Red Line" is easily the best war film I have seen 
and, just in the way that Malick takes WWII and then is able to 
transform everything into a more meaningful tapestry about human nature, 
is an amazing triumph that proves what a master Terrence Malick is at 
his craft. Hopefully, he won't wait until the year 2018 to make his next 
masterwork.

Author
Matt Prigge
Writer: Terence Malick (based on the novel by James Jones)
Starring: Sean Penn, Jim Caviezel, Adrien Brody, Ben Chaplin, Elias 
Koteas, Nick Nolte, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, John C. Reilly, Jared 
Leto, John Savage, Nick Stahl, Donal Logue, John Travolta, George 
Clooney
And so begins the hardest critique I'll probably ever have to write. So 
many movies I see leave me with instant thoughts and criticism(s), while 
others linger in my head days, even weeks before I can finally sit down, 
organize them intelligently, and write about them as best as I can 
(under whatever conditions I'm in). For an example of that, I re-saw "La 
Dolce Vita" this year around, oh, April, and by November I was finally 
able to come to as full a conclusion as I was about it and write a 
review of it. But with "The Thin Red Line," the much-anticipated World 
War II film and return by legendary-and-deserves-it director Terrence 
Malick, I just can't seem to come up with anything that either makes 
sense or shows that I know what I'm talking about. This film has either 
been overpraised or overbashed by many, and after watching it, I'm 
easily annoyed by claims that it's the best war movie of the past 20 
years, or just a bunch of pretentious drivel.
I suppose being admittingly pretentious myself does cause me to 
overglance the possibility of me thinking the latter about this film 
(although I wouldn't call it drivel because or despite my, uh, 
handicap), but I don't want to immediately jump to the conclusion that 
this film is the masterpiece that others are proclaiming it to be. It 
has a wonderful poetic and hypnotic feel to it, yes, that's unique, even 
taking into consideration Coppola's acid-trip-like "Apocalypse Now." And 
there's a whole ton to admire here, from the gorgeous cinematography 
(courtesy of our pal, John Toll) to Terrence Malick's gentle and 
beautiful direction that's in direct opposition of that of Steven 
Spielberg, whose "Saving Private Ryan" is as close to realism as this is 
to surrealism to some of the performances from the titanic cast, in 
particular Nick Nolte and Elias Koteas. But what exactly is Malick 
trying to say here, what is the film's raison d'etre, and what 
comparisons is Malick trying to show here between nature, humanity, and 
war?
"The Thin Red Line" is based on the famous novel by James Jones 
(recently portrayed by Kris Kristoferson in "A Soldier's Daughter Never 
Cries") about the battle of Guadalcanal, one of the most important and 
decisive battles of World War II. As the story begins, we see the 
native's way of life in the area, where two AWOL American soldiers have 
gone to escape, only to be shortly picked back up when an American ship 
passes through and spots them (the sight of beautiful nature being 
interruted by man-made steel is just one of the many unforgettable 
images Malick leaves you with here). One of the AWOL soldiers, Pvt. Witt 
(Jim Caviezel), is then reprimanded by one of his commanding officers, 
First Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn), and between them a strange union is 
formed: Witt, of the group that hates war and believes in everything 
nature; Welsh, with his cynical outlook on man. But this film isn't 
about either of them, to be exact. Malick's film, also scripted by him, 
doesn't have any main characters. In fact, it'd be not totally incorrect 
to say that Malick himself is the main character, and, as Roger Ebert 
pointed out, it's like he's trying to make one film and the actors are 
making another. A correct statement, but I'm not sure if Ebert meant 
that as a knock at the film, or something positive. I believe in the 
latter, but more about that later on.
The plot soon kicks in, and we meet more of those involved. The 
Lieutenenant, a man named Bell (Nick Nolte), is soon introduced, not as 
the intense, screaming maniac he is in the rest of the film (or the 
ads), but as resentful to his own commanding officer (a very brief but 
altogether not bad John Travolta) as his men are probably to him. 
Captain Staros (Elias Koteas) shows too much humanity for his men in the 
middle of a major attack, but confesses his need to be alone and his 
desire to be anywhere but in battle to his troops later on. Pvt. Bell 
(Ben Chaplin, sans native Brit accent) is constantly having flashbacks 
to afternoons with his wife, and wishes of returns to that, but then 
again, some self-destructive acts come about on his own part (like 
volunteering on a possible suicide mission in the middle of the 
picture). Most of the others are reduced to smaller roles, though, like 
famous or semi-famous actors Woody Harrelson (as an intense soldier who 
doesn't last too long, but at least goes out cinematically), John 
Cusack, John C. Reilly, Jared Leto, John Savage, Nick Stahl (another 
great death scene here), and [about 45 seconds of] George Clooney, most 
of whom just wanted to work with the director, even if it meant having a 
small role. In fact, the amount of film Malick shot was so long that 
actors like Bill Pullman were left sadly on the cutting room floor.
The main part of the battle lasts about an hour and a half long, leaving 
another hour and a half for a beginning and end, but not only does it 
feel like much of a plot, but it also (thankfully) doesn't feel like a 
three-hour sit, at least not for your's truly. I can only attribute the 
fact that it's not at all boring to Malick's direction, which, as it was 
for the other Malick film I've seen (the wonderful "Days of Heaven"), 
like that of a soft but effective brush stroke by a painter or the 
gentleness of a Bach concerto ("Air on the G String" comes to mind). A 
friend noticed no matched action cuts, but instead of this factor (so 
important that you probably don't realize it) taking us out of the 
picture's overall feel, it manages to achieve zen-like undertones, and 
the numerous shots of horrific battle coupled with shots of tall grass 
blowing in the wind or animal and/or insect life only help to make you 
relax into a state of hypnosis that is entirely unlike any war movie 
I've ever seen (again, comparisons to "Saving Private Ryan" are not only 
useless, but downright silly). In fact, this entire film is unlike any 
movie that I've ever seen, period. Malick, as usual, breaks several 
"rules" in the world of cinema, like lack of characters that the viewer 
can easily latch onto or see as a guiding point, and the use of 
narration with not one, not two, but about ten different characters.
But that's what I liked about "The Thin Red Line." It's like every 
single character in this film believes that he's the lead character, and 
Malick is only dropping in on each of them from time to time to see what 
they're thinking and how they're reacting to what's going on (Mike 
D'Angelo hilariously pointed out that it's like an "Apocalypse Now" 
where everyone's a Kurtz). But each narration or flashback lets us into 
the character's lives just enough, and Bell's backstory is the most 
heartbreaking and most easily identifiable, at least for me, with 
graceful juxtaposition of current times with the memories of he and his 
wife being intimate (almost heartbreaking, I'd say). Yet at the same 
time, nothing in the film is as moving as Koteas' Staros, who gives off 
an aura of such world-weariness and unhappiness that without narration 
and with his superb acting, I was even more moved (will someone give 
this guy some more great roles, please?). But again, where is Malick 
going with all this? Is he trying to merely say that nature is disrupted 
by war? If he is, he's not only making a terribly trite statement out of 
a beautiful film, but he's also wasting a lot of people's times (nothing 
should be that simple, and I sure hope this isn't an environmentalist 
war film). Or is he trying to show the loss of humanity in the midst of 
war? Well...that would be interesting, but if he's trying to do that, I 
think he kinda failed a bit: humanity does in fact seep through - in 
fact, a lot of it. Or is he trying to show the way we hide humanity? 
Again, if this was what he was going for, he didn't achieve it.
Or, as my best guess is, is he trying to show that everything that 
happens in this film is merely part of nature, whether it be of mother 
or of human? He doesn't seem to judge anything that goes on here, not 
even the war. The entire film is shot the same way: with graceful camera 
movement, and hypnotic editing of images together. Could this be the 
least judgmental war film of all time, a film that doesn't make any kind 
of statements on war and its subsequent damage to nature or humanity, 
but merely observes, I suppose, kind of like God or something omnipotent 
(a bit of modesty, perhaps, Mr. Malick?). Or is Malick just pulling a 
fast one on its audience members, trying to get them to think as hard as 
they can about something which has no real form or meaning or anything 
that is coherently meaningful? Whatever this film means or represents 
(as much as I am keen to believe in my theory), I was at least 
stimulated, and am at least not often quick to jump to the conclusion 
that if I can't figure it out for certain, that it's the one with the 
problem (although I could be wrong with this; maybe this film IS a 
mess...). But the point is that I was stimulated, and this may be one of 
the very few films (along with "Saving Private Ryan") that I can't 
easily pass off as merely "anti-war"...or, for that matter, "anti-war" 
at all. Frustrating, yes, but in a good way.
Home page at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Steve Kong
I'm sure I'm going to take heat for this negative review of The Thin Red
Line  but, hey, I'm not here to please everyone, am I?
The Thin Red Line comes out on the heels of Saving Private Ryan. The better
of the two is Saving Private Ryan -- by a long shot. The Thin Red Line is a
long and monotonous film that fails to get the audience attached to the
characters in the film. If Saving Private Ryan was fast and visceral, then
The Thin Red Line would be slow and methodical. The thing that Saving
Private Ryan has over The Thin Red Line was focus. And without focus The
Thin Red Line is unable to fully bring the horrors of war to us.
The Thin Red Line takes place on the island of Guadalcanal during the
Second World War. It follows a group of soldiers who fight to take control
of the island from the Japanese. That is about all of the story that one
can grasp from the movie. The rest of the movie is split between voice
overs, flashbacks, and shots of nature.
In Screenwriting 101, screenwriters are taught not to introduce too many
characters too quickly. This is a logical rule to understand. If you
introduce too many characters too quickly, you'll quickly leave the
audience shrugging their shoulders. If the audience doesn't have characters
to hold onto and relate to, the emotional impact of the film fizzles. With
The Thin Red Line characters are thrown about like mad and I could find
none to relate to; none to hold onto during the film. There is a character
introduced briefly during the opening scenes, but he remains almost
nameless and faceless throughout the film. The Thin Red Line fails in
bringing the audience to terms with its characters.
The script by Terrence Malick is based on the novel by James Jones. I have
not read the novel and cannot tell you how close the script sticks to the
novel. The script though is slow and meanders. I found myself looking at my
watch constantly during the film. The slow aimless script put with some
lazy editing makes the film very tedious to sit through. There are a few
times when the film feels like it's over but then continues on.
There are some good elements to the film though. First and foremost is the
performance given by Nick Nolte. Nolte, whom I last saw in Affliction,
gives a wonderful performance as a man who has waited for more than 15
years to prove that he's war-worthy.
The other thing to look for in the film is the beautiful cinematography by
John Toll. In Saving Private Ryan we had a visceral and drained look which
fit that film just right. In The Thin Red Line we have a colorful and
vibrant look which is wonderful to look at. But, is also a good contrast to
the things happening onscreen.
The battle scenes that take up most of the midsection of The Thin Red Line
are technically brilliant  matching those of Saving Private Ryan. Though
the battle scenes in The Thin Red Line are less gory, they still have the
same impact as those in Saving Private Ryan.
What bothered me most, next to the lack of any true characters, is the fact
that the director, Terrence Malick, has obviously put a lot of work into
the film but has put it into all the wrong places. Everything about the
film feels too worked out and there are times when the film wanders
aimlessly. For instance, it was nice to see nature in the film; the
crocodile, the wounded bird, the multiple wide shots of the forrest and
island, but after a while the film felt like a nature documentary. Yes, a
lot of the shots that I talk about are symbolic in nature, but, with half
the audience nodding off, symbolism really doesn't matter.
Don't be fooled by the big names listed in the previews. John Travolta and
George Clooney get one scene each and then they disappear. John Cussack
gets some screen time but also disappears. Sean Penn and Nick Nolte are the
two that get more than a handful of scenes. Do look for Elias Koteas as
Captain Staros, he gives a performance to remember.
The Thin Red Line could have been one hell of a war film had a few things
been fixed. First, the running time of two hours and 50 minutes could have
been easily trimmed to about two hours. And the script could have been
rewritten to give the audience something to relate to. As it stands there
is almost no emotional impact from the script. I walked of the theatre
untouched by the film. Catch The Thin Red Line on video, the battle scenes
are incredible. Next to that, there's nothing more to the film.
[Rated R for Realistic Battle Sequences and Language. Running Time: 170
Minutes]
 recipe for a hard boiled review:  one egg, two cups water, a pot,
 a helluva attitude, and a guy who loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
THE THIN RED LINE ***  Directed, written by Terrence Malick, based on the
novel by James Jones. Photography, John Toll. Editing, Billy Weber, Leslie
Jones, Saar Klein;. Production design, Jack Fisk. Music, Hans Zimmer. Exec.
producer, GeorgeStevens, Jr. Cast:  Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, Jim Caviezel ,
Ben Chaplin, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson,  Elias Koteas, Jared Leto,  Dash
Mihok, Tim Blake Nelson, Nick Nolte,   John C. Reilly,  Larry Romano, John
Savage, Arie Verveen;  David Harrod, Tom Jane,  Polyn Leona, Miranda Otto;
John Travolta (unbilled), George Clooney. A 20th Century Fox release. 170
minutes. R (violence, language)
Legend-in-his-own-time Stanley Kubrick has not made a movie since Full
Metal Jacket (1987). Now, Eyes Wide Shut, his 16th feature (and the most
anticipated film of recent years), is getting closer to release. The other
legend, Terrence Malick, had made only two pictures until now: Badlands
(1973), based on the 1958 killing spree of Charlie Starkweather and Caril
Ann Fugate, and the poetic Days of Heaven (1978), both of which represented
until now the sum total of his work, have attained cult status. Even  more
than Kubrick, Malick has been a mysterious, even reclusive figure.
Suddenly, in late 1998, Malick-Lazarus rose from the dead with The Thin Red
Line. Outside the circle of movie insiders who knew that this movie had
been worked on for years, TRL came as unexpectedly as a new comet.
The title of the autobiographical source book for TRL comes from novelist
James Jones' saying that sanity and insanity are separated by a thin red
line. It applies perfectly to wars, of any kind, and here, specifically to
the battle of the South Pacific island of Guadalcanal , the largest of the
Solomon Islands (August 1942-February 1943), one of the bloodiest
confrontations of World War II.
The film is bloody, all right, but as a war movie, something of a maverick,
complex, introspective work that is unlike anything else in the genre. Its
central part follows the Army rifle group Charlie Company (I wonder why it
is always "Charlie" in movies?) that disembarks in Guadalcanal after the
initial American attack. They wait, fight, lose men, capture a lethal
Japanese bunker on a hilltop, mop up, leave --though the film still goes on
after their departure.
But there's another side to this, a sort of first in war movies, something
that may jar the audience and make it wonder what it's all about, or,
contrariwise, fill some hard-core Malick aficionados with wonder. This is
the voice-over narration by many of the soldiers. In his previous two
movies too, Malick had resorted to voice-overs, quite successfully. Here,
however, it is not the description of the acts that is related, like the
familiar "...we were all still licking our wounds from the attack when the
captain issued the order to...," but a series of introspections,
psychological/philosophical/mystical thoughts by the men. It's all in their
heads, and much of the time it is well nigh impossible to determine who is
thinking those thoughts.
This is made even more complex by the fact that Malick has cast three
different categories of actors : familiar ones, semi-familiar, and unknown,
many of them looking enough alike to confuse the audience.
Unlike all war films (both formulaic and original) there are few clear-cut
types, whether in physical appearance, characteristic behavior, ethnic
provenance : the Italian-American, the Jew, the drawling Southerner, the
tough-but-great sergeant, the intellectual, the Brooklyn boy who dreams of
a big juicy steak when --never "if"-- he'll get home, etc.)
Malick's "military facelessness" and de-personalization are more true to
wartime than the standard way of having individuals stand out, but the
process is carried too  systematically, too far. There are exceptions, such
as the top man, Colonel Nick Nolte, a career officer whose purpose, it
would seem, is less patriotic duty or hate of the enemy than
self-advancement. "This is my first war " he says, and intends to make the
most of it. Or Captain  Elias Koteas, who is humane and ironically a lawyer
by  profession. (By coincidence, this is the second, very recent
humanization of lawyers, after Travolta's in A Civil Case. Travolta, in an
unbilled cameo, plays a General in TRL. Clooney is billed but makes merely
a microscopic appearance).
At times, the para-Hamletian or Oriental guru-like soliloquies of the men
may make a number of points, but I'd have to see the film again to sort
them out. There seems, however, to be a disconnection between the soldiers
and the nature of their thoughts. One case, clearer than most, is that of
Pvt. Bell ( Ben Chaplin) who is haunted -- in arty visual flashbacks too--
by his young, adored wife. But then this is spoiled by his quoting himself
telling her " If I go first I'll wait for you on the other side of the dark
waters." Were the men at war as poetic as all that??? In fact, did they
ever cogitate in the abstract rather than think numbly of their pains and
troubles?
The simple answer is that there is a single thinker, Harvard graduate and
Rhodes scholar Malick who has parceled out his would-be philosophical,
poetic ramblings to a number of characters. Putting thoughts in the
soldiers' heads is no more than a literary conceit.
The film opens with bucolic (not literally, as their are no cattle) vistas
of a smaller island where two GIs have gone AWOL. From this romantic
paradise (a la Jean-Jacques Rousseau the writer and Douanier Rousseau the
painter), the two men are taken to the ship that's carrying Charlie Company
to Guadalcanal.
This section is for me the best of the film, especially the sequences
where, in the vessel's very cramped innards, we see the mass of soldiers,
near-silent, worried, puzzled, fearful, sailing toward a future that's
unknown except for the fact that things will be bad. On land, much of this
is very well shown too. But I will not get into the critical cliche of "you
feel you are there." No film viewer has ever felt in his/her seat, even
remotely, what it is like to be in combat, in a death camp, a prison's
work-gang, a landing craft, and on and on.
What we really feel like is that we know nothing of the way the men feel
like, what the smells, the itches, the normal pains and the pains from
wounds, the fears, the thoughts of any individual are like, and the
confusion of all, at all times.
The interior monologues have a visual counterpart in the stylization of
nature. As an incurable history buff, I have looked at  endless footage by
combat cameramen. The Guadalcanal I've seen often makes Malick's island
seem arty. (He shot about four fifths of it in Australia  and one-fifth in
the Solomons). He has depicted much of the land in esthetic ways in order,
I suppose, to contrast the inhumanity of humans and of the animals'
survival of the species to the beauty of nature. Nothing wrong with this,
but over-underlining it can be counter-productive and distracting.
People in the know, too, may wonder about the absence of mosquitoes. At
Guadalcanal there were  24,000 Japanese killed,  and 1,600 Americans, but
there were many more thousands who died of malaria and other tropical
diseases.
This romanticism, however, is counterbalanced by combat scenes that are
mercilessly naturalistic and impart a feeling of "real time." The
piece-de-resistance attack on the Japanese bunker is splendidly
choreographed and shot. Notable too is the fact that unlike other movies,
the enemy are not "them dirty Japs" but anonymous human beings who, when
vanquished, become pitiful in their terror. Excellent too is the score by
the ever-original Hans Zimmer. Production designer Jack Fisk (Sissy
Spacek's husband) had also designed the sets for the other two Malick films.
Seesawing between realism and surrealism, cold facts and nebulous thoughts
where one cannot separate wheat from chaff, the movie may appear to be
suffering from personality disorders. In fact, it does. Beginning about ten
years ago, the genesis, preparation and realization of TRL have been an
epic mess. For his casting, Malick approached a Who's Who of performers,
sent many of them the script, had many read for him. The cast kept
changing, actors engaged were dismissed, replacement actors also were
canceled, texts constantly modified, parts modified or cut. During filming,
changes seem to have occurred by the hour. After certain ( many!) scenes
and sequences were done, Malick re-did them, often with major parts getting
reduced to near-zero. The actors were driven batty. And in the editing
stages, Malick re-re-remade his film in the cutting room.
The red line that separates sanity from madness was, indeed, very thin in
the making of this picture. It's a wonder that the end result, with all its
chaotic peculiarities, is nonetheless, memorable. And it does have one
happy aspect: the soldiers, who worry about everything, do not worry about
getting killed by their chain-smoking cigarettes.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Thin Red Line (1998)
Sean Penn, Jim Caviezel, John Cusack, Ben Chaplin, Nick Nolte, Woody 
Harrelson, Elias Koteas, Arie Verveen, Dash Mihok, Adrien Brody, John C. 
Reilly, David Harrod, John Savage, George Clooney, John Travolta, Paul 
Gleeson, Jared Leto, Tim Blake Nelson, Larry Romano, Tom Jane, Polyn 
Leona, Miranda Otto. Music by Hans Zimmer. Cinematography by John Toll. 
Directed and written by Terrence Malick, based on the novel by James 
Jones. 170 minutes.
Rated R, 2.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
William Thomas Cummings said "There are no atheists in foxholes." 
According to "The Thin Red Line," there was at least one, along with a 
number of bad poets and first year philosophy students. Visually 
sumptuous and astoundingly pretentious, "The Thin Red Line" takes a 
bracing portrayal of the battle of Guadalcanal and buries it within 
nearly three hours of nature footage, muddled philosophizing, and endless 
navel-gazing. Some have proclaimed the film a masterpiece that transcends 
traditional narrative structure to become a cinematic meditation. I found 
it more a grandiose doodle, the kind of thing a screenwriter might come 
up with after smoking too much dope while watching old war movies on TV. 
If a novice director had screened this film, he would likely have been 
told, "Nice cinematography, Skippy. Now put away your bong, take this 
self-indulgent rough cut back to the editing room and chop out about an 
hour and a half. You might start by lopping off that wandering-in-
paradise opening sequence along with the virtually incoherent 45 minutes 
at the end. Get rid of those godawful voice-overs, Hallmark Hall of Fame 
flashbacks, and a lot of the Wild Kingdom animal shots. Turn down the 
orchestra so we can hear the dialogue, color-code the soldiers so we can 
tell one from another, and lose those distracting cameos from John 
Travolta and George Clooney. Oh, and you know those scenes where you were 
trying to show that the Japanese soldiers were scared, confused human 
beings just like the Americans? It might help if you added subtitles. 
Think about it, kid." 
But instead of a novice, we're dealing with writer/director Terrence 
Malick, who dazzled filmgoers with "Badlands" in 1973 and "Days of 
Heaven" in '78, then dropped out of the filmmaking world for 20 years, 
becoming an icon in the process. Given the blind eye turned to the woozy 
metaphysics and astounding lack of discipline shown by Malick in this 
endurance test, it appears that absence really does makes the heart grow 
fonder, and the critical skills duller. 
Loosely based on the James Jones novel, "The Thin Red Line" boasts 
amazing cinematography and, midway through the film, a lengthy, gripping 
depiction of American troops battling to capture a hilltop machine gun 
nest from the Japanese. The sequence eloquently conveys the fear and 
chaos of warfare, along with the utter randomness of who lives or dies, 
as soldiers attempt to follow battle plans while bullets and grenade 
fragments rip through their comrades.
But Malick isn't content to let the horror of war speak for itself. His 
sights are set much higher. He intends the film to be a grand tone poem, 
about man and nature and God and stuff. After shooting a tremendous 
amount of footage and assembling a six hour version of the movie, he 
reinvented the story in the editing room for the three hour cut. By the 
time he was finished, one major character was left with only two lines, 
while others disappeared completely. The disjointed result minimizes 
dialogue, replacing it with orchestral swells, symbolism-loaded shots of 
birds, dreamy flashbacks and loads of voice-overs.
Oh, those voice-overs. It feels like open stage night at the World War II 
coffeehouse as the audience is subjected to lines like "Love, where does 
it come from? Who lit this flame in us?" Wait, there's more. Try these on 
for size. "What's this war at the heart of nature? Why does nature vie 
with itself? Is there an avenging power in nature?'' "How did we lose the 
good that was given us? Let it slip away. Scattered. Careless. What's 
keeping us from reaching out, touching the glory?" The film is packed 
with gems like these. Hell, one guy even narrates his own death.
Out of all the chatter, I found the ongoing debate between a spiritual 
soldier ("Maybe all men got one big soul that everybody's a part of") and 
a foxhole atheist ("Only one thing a man can do. Find something that's 
his. Make an island for himself.") engaging, but their intriguing 
relationship is given scant attention, as Malick instead focuses his 
camera on waving grass and prismatic beams of sunlight cutting through 
forest canopies.
I've said little about the actors because they tend to blur together. Two 
major players (Jim Caviezel and Ben Chaplin) resemble each other so much 
that it's hard to distinguish between them, and the rest come and go so 
quickly that you can't get a handle on their characters. That said, Sean 
Penn and Elias Koteas make the most of their screen time, Nick Nolte is 
imposing as a throwback to the John Wayne era and Woody Harrelson has a 
brief, but tragically moving scene.
If you're interested in a cinematic meditation on life and death that 
actually has substance, rent Peter Weir's "Fearless." I wish Malick had. 
Then he might have realized that pretty pictures and vague pondering do 
not a movie make. War is hell, and, moments of brilliance aside, so is 
"The Thin Red Line."

Author
Homer Yen
One of the first images that we see in this film is of a crocodile
maneuvering itself into the murky waters as it lies in wait for it's
next meal.  It is a killing machine that preys mercilessly upon
unsuspecting victims.  In another scene, we see an idyllic island
village.  Children are playing innocently among themselves while the
adults carry out their daily chores practically oblivious to the
war-ravaged world that exists only a few miles away.  This is a
society that reflects Man's best nature.  But the nature of paradise
that we all hope to experience is always being challenged.  Desire,
vengeance, anger, and other urges' constantly push us further away
from Eden and into the same realm of the crocodile.  Soldiers, I
suppose, may struggle the most with this fragile balance between
protecting the goodness of society and killing others to reach that
goal.  How do they contain their urges'?  How do they stay true to
themselves?  `The Thin Red Line' looks at this issue several times
over against the backdrop of World War II.
The film introduces several characters who all have their personal
struggles.  Among them are Capt. Staros (Elias Koteas) and Lt. Col.
Tall (Nick Nolte).  Staros is a lawyer by trade and has seen too many
of his friends die in his arms during the many campaigns with which he
has been involved.  He has a soft heart, and will do whatever he can
to protect those under his command.  Tall, however, is a man that has
been preparing for war for the last fifteen years.  Now that he
finally has his chance, he yearns to make an impact, even if it means
sacrificing many lives during an ill-planned campaign to overtake an
enemy stronghold.  He barks out orders with his gritty voice and
challenges his often-weary troops to rise up to the occasion.  Staros
takes exception to his zealousness and hesitates to execute Tall's
commands.  Other characters include Pvt. Witt (Jim Caviezel) who is an
optimist that wants to find paradise; Capt. Gaff (John Cusack) who
doesn't like the prospect of being promoted; and Sgt. Welsh (Sean
Penn) whose soul has become irreparably cynical.
This film certainly doesn't play like a conventional war film.  A good
portion of the film focuses on the soldiers' thoughts about the
starkness of reality while scenes of their personal Eden flash back
and forth like some Nature channel montage.  As an entertainment
seeker, it would be difficult for me to recommend this film.  One
thing was that it was very frustrating trying to distinguish among the
many characters - especially when they're all covered with grime, dirt
and blood.  Character development didn't seem to be a high priority. 
In addition, many of the characters seemed to randomly appear and then
disappear.  There lacked a sense of consistency and it was hard to
become attached to any of the players.  Additionally, the movie is
just over 3 hours long, which makes sitting through this philosophical
exercise very difficult.  In fact, after the showing, many of the
patrons left with a somewhat bewildered or puzzled look on their
faces.  I suppose that they expected a more traditional kind of war
film, but got something completely different.  If you're hoping for a
film about war and it's potentially terrific conflicts, you can expect
and uphill battle.


Author
George Wu
What I look for in a movie is not necessarily perfection.  Sometimes a
movie has such strong ideas that despite whatever flaws it may have, I will
prefer it to a better-made film that is not as thought-provoking.  The Thin
Red Line is flawed but it provokes.  Terence Malick returns to filmmaking
20 years after Days of Heaven and produces this meditative look at war. 
Unlike this year's Saving Private Ryan, which dwells on war as a necessary
evil and explores the moral ambiguities thereof, The Thin Red Line simply
says war is waste.  While that might seem obvious to some, only after
experiencing the film do you realize how profound a waste it is.  Saving
Private Ryan has an underlying and practical acceptance that war will occur
and it has a great cost; The Thin Red Line says idealistically avoid this
at all costs.  One message is not necessarily more correct than the other. 
It just depends on one's point of view.  In Malick's film, war is set in a
tropical paradise, and John Toll's cinematography is beyond lush.  The
setting poses the question, why are we fighting in the face of such beauty?
 In Saving Private Ryan, the capture of a German soldier presents the moral
quandary of whether to let him go.  In The Thin Red Line, the Japanese
present the moral quandary of war in the first place.  They are just like
the Americans -- frightened and angry, grieving and praying.  All that
separates them is war.
The flaw in The Thin Red Line comes in the voice-overs.  Unbelievable as
coming from the characters and sometimes pretentious, sometimes corny, the
voice-overs tell us what the images before us already do and are completely
unnecessary.  Dispensing with them, Malick could have achieved a
Tarkovskian grandeur.  Instead, he gets distracting self-consciousness.
Aside from that, Malick's direction is stunning.  The tracking shots across
windswept hills and  around transports speeding toward shore are
extraordinary.  Sean Penn, Elias Koteas, and Nick Nolte give the best
performances.  Penn is subtle as a sergeant trying to hide his humanism,
Koteas is genuine as a compassionate captain, and Nolte startling as a
colonel whose blood vessels are about to burst if he cannot win his battle.
 John Travolta and George Clooney are the worst in cameo roles.
Ultimately however, The Thin Red Line's interest is not in the characters
and it is not in drama. It has been frequently criticized for its lack of
dramatic structure, but Malick clearly has different things on his mind. 
Has no one ever thought that getting dramatic entertainment from war is
exploitative?  What Malick is working with is theme, and in that, The Thin
Red Line is most provoking.

Author
Greg King
THE THIN RED LINE (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Terrence Malick
Stars: Sean Penn, Nick Nolte, Jim Caviezel, John Cusack, Elias Koteas, 
Woody Harrelson, Ben Chaplin, 
Jared Leton, Adrien Brody, George Clooney, John C Reilly, John Travolta, 
John Savage, Arie Verveen, 
Dash Mihok
Running time: 171 minutes.
Writer/director Terrence Malick can hardly be called prolific.
He made only two films (the critically acclaimed Badlands and Days Of
Heaven) in the mid-'70's, before taking a self imposed twenty year
hiatus from Hollywood.  His first film in two decades is one of the
most eagerly anticipated cinema events this side of the new Star Wars
film.  While it is certainly visually impressive, Malick's The Thin
Red Line is something of a disappointment, especially when compared
with Spielberg's achievement in the recent devastating and
unforgettable Saving Private Ryan.
Based on the novel by James Jones, The Thin Red Line deals
with US forces fighting the Japanese army at Guadalcanal, a bitter and
costly campaign that became one of the turning points of W.W.II.
However, Malick's epic war film is a different animal to Spielberg's.
Unlike Spielberg, Malick doesn't immediately hurtle us into the
inferno of battle.  Instead, he lulls us into the brutality of war
through an extended prologue.  Witt (Jim Caviezel), an AWOL soldier,
lives in short-lived tranquillity in a peaceful native village
somewhere in the Pacific.  He becomes part of the massive US landing
force at Guadalcanal.
The film's centrepiece is the extended and savage campaign to
destroy Japanese machine gun fortifications and take a crucial hill.
This often graphic and quite harrowing battle occupies over half of
the film's three hour running time.  However, the action lacks the
intensity and ferocity of Spielberg's recreation of the fury of
warfare.  It also seems to lack that gritty air of authenticity that
seemed to effectively suck audiences into the maelstrom.
The combat scenes give the audience the extremes of heroism.
But Malick is also concerned with showing the madness of battle
fatigue, and the film depicts the senseless loss of life and futile
carnage of the war.  The Thin Red Line is almost a profound and almost
poetic meditation on the nature of war and how it poisons man's soul.
There's nothing noble about this bloody conflict, and, ultimately,
there are no winners.  The film was shot on location, partly in
tropical far north Queensland as well as in the Solomon Islands.
Such is Malick's reputation that he had a veritable who's who
of Hollywood queuing up for small roles, including John Travolta, John
Cusack, Woody Harrelson, George Clooney, and Sean Penn.
Unfortunately, though, few of the characters leave a lasting impact on
the audience, and I found that I didn't really care about them or
their fate.  Nick Nolte is dynamic as the obsessed and driven colonel
who relishes his first opportunity to fight a war after fifteen years
in the army, and who doesn't care how many men have to lose their
lives in securing a vital strategic position.  Caviezel brings a human
face to the film as Witt, the reluctant soldier who ultimately becomes
a hero when tested in battle.
The Thin Red Line is certainly Malick's most epic and
ambitious film to date, and it is as meticulously crafted and
evocative as his previous work.  He gives this war film an almost
elegiac quality and a rare humanity.  His sweeping vision is
complemented by the spectacularly gorgeous cinematography of dual
Oscar winner John Toll and the haunting score from Hans Zimmer.

Author
Jason Wallis
Starring Sean Penn, Elias Koteas, Nick Nolte, Ben Chaplin, John Cusack,
Woody Harrelson, John C. Reilly, 
Adrien Brody, Jared Leto, George Clooney and John Travolta 
Directed by Terrence Malick 
Rated R for graphic violence and profanity 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 170 minutes 
Why, oh why couldn't have they have held the release of The Thin Red Line
just one month longer? In a year that boasted the most successful and
realistic war film ever (Saving Private Ryan, in case you've been pulling a
Salinger for the past six months or so), the last thing you'd want to do is
release a poetic and surrealistic mediation on the war inside the human
soul. With the Private Ryan hype still in full swing, America just isn't
ready for that kind of ambiguity. Already drawing unfavorable comparisons
to Spielberg's film, American maverick Terrence Malick's return to the
cinema is all but doomed. 
And it really deserves better. I'm fully prepared to be shunned by the
world of film criticism for saying this, but I firmly believe that The Thin
Red Line offers a much more potent experience than Ryan. Spielberg's
version of the last great war took you inside physical battle like few
films before it ever have, but Malick's film is so haunting and lyrical in
it's delivery and imagery that, yes, I would compare it to Apocalypse Now.
Quite an analogy, I know, but it's the honest to God truth. More symbolic
than Full Metal Jacket and even more philosophical than Oliver Stone's
Platoon, it is very possibly the finest war film of the last twenty years. 
With it's first image of a crocodile slithering beneath the murk of a
swamp, symbolizing the violence and terror waiting just under the surface
of the human soul, this one doesn't burst to the screen with vivid
intensity like most battle films do. Rather, Malick chooses to establish an
overall ascetic tone and mood to the film before he confronts you with his
brutal and at times uncompromising and blood-soaked engagements of
violence. 
Actually, the movie at first feels more like a Natural Geographic
documentary than a war adventure. Presenting us with a view of nature
undisturbed by man's inhumanity to man, the film treats us to a glimpse of
native life, where a couple of AWOL U.S. troops have deserted to. After an
American battleship returns to the island to claim it's soldiers, it whisks
them off to yet another natural habitat just waiting to be disrupted, where
the remainder of The Thin Red Line is to take place. 
Here, the movie makes a sudden and, admittingly, welcome change of pace.
While Private Ryan's assault on the beach lasted twenty five minutes,
Malick goes into high-gear for no less than an hour and a half. This is
where the movie really shines; the cinematography, sound and editing are
all a spectacle to behold. But even though these ninety minutes provide
ample amounts of blood, guts and octane, Malick still upholds a strange
kind of dream-like beauty to what is going on. Much like it's obvious
predecessor Apocalypse Now, it causes the viewer to go into a trance-like
state. We realize the horror of what we are being subjected to, but it's
just so beautiful that we can't tear our eyes from it for one moment. 
Like all great films, The Thin Red Line does have it's share of flaws. Most
obviously, it's not very accessible to the average movie-goer; Saving
Private Ryan owed much of it's success to it's utter simplicity. I'm not
saying that's necessarily a bad thing; I enjoy it when a film challenges
me, but this one is so complex in it's ideas that it could very easily be
seen as an exercise in pretension. I'll even admit that it took me two
viewings to fully comprehend the full weight of the movie. 
One thing that really got to me personally was the sudden appearances of
John Travolta and George Clooney at the beginning and end of the story.
Like the bookends of Private Ryan, they jerked me out of the rhythm of the
movie. Kenneth Branagh made the same mistake with 1996's Hamlet when he
cast such stars as Robin Williams, Jack Lemmon and Billy Crystal in two
minute cameos. Casting major stars in bit parts disconnects you from the
story just long enough to make you realize that you are watching a movie,
and that can be a grave mistake at times. 
By the end of the film, though, the good things have outweighed the bad
about two million to one and make for one of the most memorable, unnerving
and effective films of 1998. 
*Homepage at http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
Terrence Malik's 'The Thin Red Line' is a diatribe against war, an 
anti-violence tone poem that highlights the senselessness and insanity 
that occurs when humans insist on fighting.  It is also a very uneven 
film.
Malik's screenplay begins with two GIs walking about a scant village of 
native islanders, with whom they seem to be familiar.  The friendliness 
of Pvt. Witt (James Caviezel) is obvious in the easy way he relates to a 
woman caring for her child.  After an American patrol boat passes, we 
learn that Witt and his friend have been AWOL, actually taking a break 
from the war and living with the villagers.  Instantly we are forced to 
note the contrast between the lush  rainforest, beaches leading down to 
sparkling water, and the troop ship on which Witt is held prisoner by 
his own army.  Sgt. Edward Welch (Sean Penn) takes a sort of 
philosophical pity on Witt, however, and instead of being 
court-martialed, the young man is sent to a disciplinary unit where he 
helps care for the wounded.  It is here that Witt commences his role as 
Christ figure, a gentle soul sent along to teach others by kind acts and 
examples.  Ironic for a soldier, especially when Witt talks his way back 
into "C" Company, which is run by Welsh and captained by James Staros 
(Elias Koteas). 
The film follows this company throughout their campaign to take an 
important hill on the Pacific island of Guadalcanal in the Second World 
War.  As much as it can be categorized, the plot consists of these men's 
exploits, triumphs and deaths in their attempts to capture this 
strategic strip of land from the occupying Japanese forces.  
The history surrounding the battles around the Solomon Islands is 
non-existent; perhaps Malik can justify the paucity of military planning 
in the name of character development or even in the service of 
portraying war in its allegorical sense. But it would have been nice to 
see more than one soldier with a clipboard, and more than two scenes 
showing where these weary warriors slept or mended or spend their off 
hours.  Anyhow, Malik is not after portraying what happened throughout 
the entire offensive on Guadalcanal and Tulagi between August, 1942 and 
February, 1943.  As I stated before, his intention seems to be showing 
the grisly reality of modern combat, focusing on the devastation wreaked 
upon individual men.
A fascinating element employed by Malik is the voice-over monologues.  
First we hear Witt talking about the natives, followed by other 
characters ruminating on what's happening to their lives.  Images 
interrupt their voices, a wife swinging or a child in a field - remnants 
of real-world memories many of the men carry with them in the same way 
they carry lockets with photographs.  These sudden, almost 
expressionistic sequences serve to show the source of meaning in these 
men's lives; they add a sense of home and comfort in the chaos of battle 
and the mortal boredom of waiting to attack.  Because they are risky 
narrative devices, these mental flashbacks are to be admired.  It's when 
they go on too long that they threaten the success of the film.
A very strong aspect is the battle scenes.  Starting with the LCIs 
racing toward shore, their engines rumbling above the spirited shouts of 
the troops, Malik depicts energy and action very well.  The assault by 
Charlie Company on the hill will rank with the best and most realistic 
of filmed combat.  It contains so many dimensions of the human condition 
- courage and cowardice, ethical dilemmas and accidents, terror and 
egotism - that a review cannot do justice to its accomplishment.  Malik 
has choreographed truly realistic and horrifying work here.
A lot has been said about Malik's striking camera work, and it's clear 
why.  The settings are beautifully shot, from the hills covered with 
high grass to the green glassiness of the sea.  When Malik juxtaposes 
the war atop these images from Eden, we get a quick idea of the 
destructiveness of humankind.  Just over the ridge of five-foot grass, 
or across the clearing in the bamboo forest, there lurks a painful 
death.  One is reminded again that World War II is often glorified, its 
purpose just.  But directors like Malik and Steven Spielberg show us 
scenes just as hellish as anything set during other wars.  Occasionally, 
though, the individual daydream sequences last too long, seeming to lack 
direction and sometimes coherence.
'The Thin Red Line' is well acted.  If you are like me and do not care 
for Sean Penn, perhaps because of the reputation formed in his younger 
years, you will probably change your mind.  I saw him just recently in 
'Dead Man Walking', and was impressed by his complete assumption of the 
character.  His Sgt. Welsh is sculpted just as carefully, with searing 
stares and wrinkled, compassionate brow.  Nick Nolte, as Lt. Colonel 
Gordon Tall, hands in the other outstanding performance.  From the time 
we first see him licking the boots of his one-star general (John 
Travolta) to the time he inadvertently reveals his megalomania, Nolte 
flashes the subtle expressions, mannerisms and intonations owned by the 
very best actors.
 Several actors distinguish themselves in supporting roles.  John Cusack 
is so good that he seems underused.  Woody Harrelson sketches a mean but 
heroic Sgt. Keck in his brief role.  As Captain Staros, Elias Koteas 
assumes a gutsy, fatherly authority:  he's a lawyer turned trained 
killer, a reluctant leader with the backbone to stand up to the rants 
and ordered suicides of Col Tall.  In their cameo appearances, John 
Travolta and George Clooney struck me as so much fluff.  Like a couple 
of the precious dream shots, they call too much attention to themselves.  
I like them as actors, but why hire leading men for jobs character 
actors can do better?
It's a fair judgment that the 170-minute running time helps to cause the 
saggy narrative structure, particularly at the end.  Malik goes 
over-the-top with his poetic disgust, but his grasp for greatness puts 
within our reach a far better film than one made by a safer director 
with less vision.  I would recommend seeing this lush and memorable 
piece on the big screen if you can;  otherwise, wait until its premiere 
on commercial television.


Author
Jerry Saravia
It took director Terrence Malick twenty years to make a film, which is about a
decade longer than it would take Stanley Kubrick. Did he run out of ideas, or
was he sick of Hollywood? It is an inconsequential matter because Malick has
crafted one of the most poetic, life-affirming statements on war that has ever
been produced by a Hollywood studio. "The Thin Red Line" is a masterpiece - a
quiet, powerful observation of men in war, their lingering thoughts on what war
means to them, and how violent human behaviors affect nature. 
The film's opening shot is not of bullets grazing and imploding on the beach
of Normandy, but of a crocodile entering a lake underwater. The next few shots
centers on Private Witt (James Caviezel) cavorting among the natives on an
island off the coast, but where are we? Why are we here? Isn't this a war film?
Later, an American patrol ship spots Witt and another soldier, and it is up to
First Sgt. Edward Welsh (Sean Penn) to remind Witt what their God-like mission
is. Their mission, as Lieut. Col. Tall (Nick Nolte) explains, is to ascend upon
a certain hill on the Guadalcanal island to infiltrate a Japanese bunker. This
is the conventional section of the film - the war itself to find the bunker,
and the risk of being shot down like flies by the Japs. With its sweeping
grandeur, artfully shot and edited battles, and incongruous points-of-view,
this long sequence caught me off guard, and is thus tinged with more emotion
and heartbreak than anything in "Saving Private Ryan." I think the reason it
works so well is that we are aware how unfair and unpredictable war is -
bullets and gunfire can come from anywhere. One soldier (played by Woody
Harrelson) accidentally pulls the pin on a grenade thus literally blowing
himself apart! 
Malick also invests time on how his characters think of war in the context of
their lives, and their loved ones back home. One particular soldier, Private
Bell (Ben Chaplin), is always reminiscing of his days with his wife, whom we
see in short shrift during flashbacks. He wants to be with her, but knows that
he may meet her "in the dark waters." Nolte's ferocious lieutenant wonders why
he's fighting, then he realizes that war is what he's been working up to for
twenty years. His fierce attitude is upheld by his notion that war makes a man
virile - "My son is a baker salesman." When he speaks eloquently about his
tough career to Captain Gaff (John Cusack), he says to him: "You are my son." 
Malick also makes vivid points about nature, and how the brutal inhumanity of
war affects it. This is where his artistry truly lies - his films, "Badlands"
and "Days of Heaven," are inherently about nature. This time, along with the
help of cinematographer John Toll, he shows us the raping of the earth by men
of war. Although nature is a process of violence, war rapes the blades of grass
and the soil by its incessant violence upon it, including explosions. This is a
theme that the mass audience will not care to understand - close-ups of
colorful parrots, bats, rattlesnakes, and crocodiles do not a war film make, do
they? Yet, these innocent animal species did not ask to be part of it, nor did
the natives who walk among the pastures or the soldiers who are killed
arbitrarily. That close symmetry between man and animal is repeatedly and
intelligently paralleled by Malick. 
"The Thin Red Line" is not the type of film that is character-driven, but
rather character-oriented. In other words, this is a film about faces within
the confines of nature, and the chaos that surrounds them. The interior
monologues are told through voice-overs (originally voiced by Billy Bob
Thornton) of individual men and their perceptions of what war entails. 
The actors who make the strongest impression are James Caveziel's divine
Private Witt (the dreamy, poignant hero of the film), Nick Nolte's memorably
furious Colonel, Elias Koteas's straight-arrow Captain Staros who refuses to
send his men to death, Sean Penn's amazingly watchable Sgt. Welsh, Ben
Chaplin's courageous Private Bell, and the stoic, eccentric quality of John
Savage's McCron. Other actors (John Travolta, George Clooney, John C. Reilly,
Adrien Brody) are left in the dust (there was extensive recutting), but
Malick's astute direction always rivets our attention. 
Malick has crafted a beautiful film full of some potent, sublime images. I'll
never forget the shots of the tortured Japanese soldiers and their cries of
pain; Caveziel's beatific face and the moment he's confronted by the enemy; the
deployed cargoes crashing on the water; the sunlight peering through the trees.
Overall, "The Thin Red Line's" overt, lingering lyricism indicates that nature
should be restored and not ignored, in light of virile fighters on the terrain.
Rarely has such a war film made the point that our surroundings, and what we
make of them, is infinitely more important than the evil that men do. 
Check out more reviews at JERRY AT THE MOVIES located at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Victory A. Marasigan
War movies haven't changed much in the short history of film. Even in
the best of them, the only real new wrinkle offered is the raised level
of gore which the audience is allowed to focus on. Sometime-director
Terrence Malick's The Thin Red Line, an ambitious new film about World
War II's pivotal Battle of Guadalcanal, attempts to take the war movie
to a fresh new level. It presents war as a 166-minute blank verse poem.
Given that Malick intended a different approach to directing his epic,
it's too bad that the film itself is an overlong, pretentious
head-scratcher. Malick meanders between disturbing imagery of his
soldiers in battle, and glowing National Geographic-style portraits of
the wildlife and regional fauna. A monotonous round-robin narrative
(voiced by a handful of the film's main figures) anesthetizes his
strange visuals . This sort of abstract pondering at the film's heart
creates a paradoxical situation: Malick tries to convey dream-like
meditation when his soldiers on-screen are operating at a more urgent
fight-or-flight level of consciousness.
The director seems to have been making things up as he went along,
hoping that somewhere in all of the footage he shot he might be able to
paste together a movie that would do service to its source material (it
was based on the book by James Joyce). This may be why so many "main"
characters seem to come under the camera's scrutiny, only to eventually
disappear without even a scream or a "Tell my wife I love her."
The few characters who appear long enough for us to appreciate come
saddled with clearly-outlined motivating ideals. Jim Caviezel is Pvt.
Witt, a wandering nature-boy who has a habit of taking breaks to enjoy
the scenery. Nick Nolte's glory-hungry Lt. Col. Tall is inscrutably
one-note in his selfish convictions. As the beleaguered Pvt. Bell, Ben
Chaplin spends most of the film in a serene daydream of his wife, who is
is single light at the end of a hellish tunnel.
Sean Penn as 1st Sgt. Welsh is billed as a main character (his screen
time and dialogue are more abundant than most of the other talent), yet
he like so many other players in the film doesn't leave a lasting
impression. A high celebrity-cameo factor presents another problem: It's
very difficult to concentrate when you're thinking about how much John
Travolta and
George Clooney (yes, they're in it too) got paid for their scant minutes
of screen time.
Where The Thin Red Line does succeed is in depicting tense,
heart-pounding battle scenes, especially in an extended sequence in
which the Americans attempt to cut through long grass to take out the
Japanese enemy's bunkers. The scene is not as bloody or explicit as the
similar invasion in Saving Private Ryan, but the hold-your-breath terror
is just as
effective.
Malick's innovative spin in presenting this conflict is not a weakness
in itself. Francis Ford Coppola was able to successfully present war as
lucid dream with 1976's Apocalypse Now. With a confident hand and a less
non-commital attitude towards the subject matter, Malick may have been
able to make a film which is truly cerebrally-transcendent. In its
present form,
The Thin Red Line fails to provoke coherent thought or connect the
viewer with the stark reality of war. Malick has essentially performed
the cinematic analog of a prefrontal lobotomy.
Reviewed January 12, 1999 at Loews White Marsh Theater, White Marsh, MD.

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Thin_Red_Line_ (R) **** (out of ****)
Love a film, hate a film, all points in between--I generally know what I
want to say and how to say it.  So why, then, do I feel so ill-equipped
to thoroughly articulate my feelings about Terrence Malick's
_The_Thin_Red_Line_?  Perhaps it's just my own limitations as a writer,
or maybe it's just the natural limitations of words themselves, which can
only fail to accurately describe the challenging but wholly intoxicating
experience of Malick's long-awaited return to the directorial chair. 
_The_Thin_Red_Line_ is something that completely transcends the medium--a
film is as close to pure poetry than anything I've ever seen onscreen.
To state that _The_Thin_Red_Line_ centers on a group of American
soldiers fighting for survival in the Guadalcanal conflict of World War
II is to say everything and nothing about the film.  A number of violent
combat scenes occupy most of the film's three-hour running time, but the
war itself is perhaps Malick's most remote concern--and the soldiers'. 
The central fight in which the soldiers are engaged is not necessarily
the one with Japanese troops: it is the unique personal struggle within
each of them.  And the one thing whose survival their fighting for is not
their lives, but their eternal souls.
Malick uses his favorite device, the voiceover (used extensively in both
of his previous films, 1973's _Badlands_ and 1978's _Days_of_Heaven_), to
intone each of the soldiers' inner ruminations.  Yet while the sounds of
the voices and their specific subjects differ, the "voice" remains
constant: a stream of oblique thoughts attempting to rationalize--and
find an escape from--the horror of war and the world that produces it. 
Pvt. Witt (Jim Caviezel) searches for the light of beauty and order in
all things, from life in a simple native village to a comrade meeting a
tragic end.  Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn) longs to find a numbness and truth
that will spare himself the psychological toll of his reality.  Pvt.
Bell's (Ben Chaplin) retreat is memories of his wife and his certainty
that they will be reunited--whether it be in this world or the next. 
Capt. Staros (Elias Koteas) prays his salvation and that of the soldiers
that have become surrogate family.  Col. Tall (Nick Nolte), a
much-passed-over veteran in the twilight of his career, doggedly pursues
the one victory under his command that would serve as a vindicating
legacy.
_The_Thin_Red_Line_ plays less like a film than a piece of fine art,
which accounts for the immeasurable difficulty of describing and
analyzing it (and the rather dull-sounding synopsis).  Malick's
screenplay, based on James Jones's novel of the same name, is a
remarkably textured piece of work, directly and (mostly) indirectly
addressing themes of varying complexity.  As such, like a painting, one
needs to distance oneself to experience the full breadth of its thematic
resonance; the film just grows richer with time.
But also like a painting, the film is not without its surface delights
that can be immediately noticed and appreciated.  Chief among these is
John Toll's exquisite cinematography, which captures the beauty of both
the stillness and chaos that comes with battle, from blades of grass
blowing in the wind, to the mine and bomb blasts that seem to erupt to a
steady rhythm.  Not to be overlooked is the fine work of the large cast. 
Pvt. Witt is the character closest to a lead, and newcomer Caviezel has a
quiet, calming presence that fits his character's--and the
film's--low-key mood.  That said, I much preferred the work of two actors
in smaller roles: Chaplin, heartbreaking as the lovelorn Pvt. Bell; and
Koteas, touching as the perhaps too-honorable Capt. Staros.  Of the more
marquee names in the ensemble, Penn, Nolte, and (to a lesser extent) John
Cusack (as Capt. Gaff) have the beefiest roles, and they impress the most
in this group.  Cameos by John Travolta and especially George Clooney are
more distracting than anything else, and Woody Harrelson tries a bit too
hard to stand out among the crowd--and that he does, albeit for the wrong
reasons. 
The word that will undoubtedly be used most to describe
_The_Thin_Red_Line_ is "meditation," and that description could not be
more apt.  A person in a state of meditation outward appears to be doing
nothing, but he or she is engaging in an act of focus and clarity full of
rich internal rewards.  The similarly introspective nature of
_The_Thin_Red_Line_ accounts for the wildly polarized reaction to the
film; its detractors are obviously fixed on the blank exterior, while its
admirers are able to tap into the dense interior.  Chances are most
audiences will belong to the former group.  But much like another war-set
film not really about war, Francis Ford Coppola's _Apocalypse_Now_,
Terrence Malick's _The_Thin_Red_Line_ will receive its just due over
time.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com___________________________________________________________________
You don't need to buy Internet access to use free Internet e-mail.
Get completely free e-mail from Juno at http://www.juno.com/getjuno.html
or call Juno at (800) 654-JUNO [654-5866]

Author
David Wilcock
Wow, this is a toughie to review. A return to directing from Badlands
director Malick, The Thin Red Line is a movie that will delight some, and
bore the hell out of others. Myself, I was certainly leaning towards the
'delight' side. The plot, even though the film doesn't really have one,
centres around a group of American soldiers and their thoughts and feelings
fighting against the Japanese. The screenplay is mainly carried along by
voice overs of the various cast members, and suitable imagery is inserted
through to emphasise the symbolism.
The Thin Red Line is certainly an intriguing affair, much more intellectual
and provoking than the ridiculous trailers promise. While Fox are trying to
market this film as competition to Saving Private Ryan, by showing mainly
clips of the action sequences, The Thin Red Line is nothing like Spielbergs
effort. Although it sometimes tries a little too hard to be profound, the
makings of a truly great movie are contained inside The Thin Red Line,
unlike the typical 'Hollywoodness' that featured throughout Ryan.
Having never seen Malick's previous films, I was not quite sure what to
expect from a Malick movie. Thankfully, I was not disappointed. While
missing some of the interesting camera techniques Spielberg exploited well
in Ryan, Malick takes things at a much slower pace. He also likes to get his
message across, using heavy symbolism throughout to show the develop and
growth of the few principal characters. The style may be annoying to same:
you may feel patronised after the 10th close up shot of wildlife. But it's
there, and it largely works. Sometimes Malick likes to go into excess, the
first five minutes drags out a very simple point. And the incessant use of
voice overs to progress the plot may eventually grate.
Another criticism may be that the characters never get enough time to
develop. We _do_ get to know a few characters well, principally Ben
Chaplins, Nick Noltes and Sean Penns. All three actors are great, by the
way, with Nolte's hard assed colonel being the most enjoyable performance,
and Sean Penn and Chaplin delivering very intense performances. Considering
the minimal script they have, and the huge reliance on voice overs, the cast
have to show their emotions and feelings through their actions, and they all
do this admirable. Even the bit actors leave an impact: John Cusack and
Woody Harrelson amongst others aren't bad at all. But again the film seems
to go into excess. John Travolta and George Clooney turn up in split second
roles, and neither performance is that good. They could of been cut out, but
what would be the point in a film that seems to cherish every characters
that features?
Despite the overlength, the sometimes unnesscary cameos, and the rampant
symbolism, The Thin Red Line is a demanding movie that can be enjoyed.
Although the entertainment factor can't reach that of Saving Private Ryan,
the film has a huge amount to offer for the patient.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Terrence Malick
Cast: Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, George
Clooney, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, Elias Koteas, Jared Leto, John C.
Reilly, Nick Nolty, John Travolta, Bill Pullman, Paul Gleason
Screenplay: Terrence Malick
Producers: Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill, John Roberdeau
Runtime: 170 min.
US Distribution: 20th Century Fox
Rated R: violence, language
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Before going to see The Thin Red Line, I had heard that the film was
nothing but a visually impressive look into Terrence Malick's own ego. 
I heard that it was bloated, impenetrable, and thematically weak.   I
didn't hear that it was a bad movie -- no, I simply had heard that it
wasn't going to be as good as I hoped it would be.  Times like this
remind me of why I shouldn't listen to word of mouth.
You see, The Thin Red Line is a wonderful film.  It's at once the most
visually stunning picture of 1998 and the most thematically layered. 
Malick's loose interpretation of the James Jones novel is also a hugely
ambitious picture --  it brings us a frightening, surrealistic vision of
war.  It shows us the way World War II affected individual soldiers.  It
shows us the way war destroys nature and the physical world.  Malick
does all of this in one, three-hour package that can not possibly be
fully understood with just one viewing.
One problem I heard is that the film doesn't have much of a narrative. 
This is true, though I don't think it's a problem.  The picture centers
around a group of soldiers and their advance on Guadalcanal.  As the
film opens, we meet Private Witt (James Caviezel), living among a group
of peaceful natives.  The first twenty minutes of the film are slow and
pensive -- Malick is clearly focusing on the simple lifestyle of the
natives, the way they happily live in and among nature.  One of the best
shots in the film occurs early on:  after several minutes of the serene,
colorful images, an American ship emerges in the distance.  It's a
jostling image, and one that strikes us simply because technology, when
compared to nature, is ugly.
The next act of the picture has the soldiers advancing on Guadalcanal. 
They land on the island with no casualties, but they soon find Japanese
resistance on the rolling hills inland.  Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (Nick
Nolte) is in charge of the operation.   Beneath him is Captain James
Staros (Elias Koteas); Tall wants the men to charge straight up the
hill, but Staros has a problem sending his men in to die.  There are
many soldiers in these scenes, but only a few get notable screen time: 
Private Witt, with his constant introspections about the meaning of
life, and Private Bell (Ben Chaplin), who can not stop thinking about
his wife (Miranda Otto) back home.
Malick's most apparent success is in the battle scenes.  They are truly
frightening, and flawlessly photographed.  For several minutes, Malick
focuses on the lush, verdant hills, covered in tall grass, intertwined
with the gales that slide through the rolls.  Then, without warning,
bombs explode, defacing the stunning image.   The soldiers run through
the landscape like ants, getting picked off by by Japanese soldiers,
invisible in the mountainsides.  Hans Zimmer's musical score pounds
mercilessly in the background.  Malick is unflinching here -- people die
instantly, without big, Hollywood death scenes.  Characters that he
introduces to us suddenly lose their life, and Malick doesn't
apologize.  He perfectly captures the unrelenting chaos of war.
But the war scenes are not all that Malick does perfectly.  The slow,
contemplative character moments are equally powerful.  The film has a
lot of voice-over narration; we can't always tell who's talking, and
that's a sobering statement on Malick's part -- he seems to suggest that
none of these soldiers have any life beyond war.  Frequent shots of the
serenity of nature provide jostling evidence that Malick finds humanity
and war a cancerous force on earth.
The Thin Red Line is also a showcase for the actors involved.  I
normally find Nick Nolte repulsive, but he is the shining performance
here.  There is so much in his character -- from the reasons he wants
the soldiers to head right into death, all the way down to the
disappointment he has in his son -- and Nolte handles all of these
layers with ease.  Caviezel is also wonderful; I've never seen him in
anything else, but I found his character the most interesting.  Chaplin
(Washington Square) is another standout; watch carefully the scene in
which he reads the letter from his wife.   Both Koteas and Penn have
significant roles, and both handle the burden effortlessly.  There are
also interesting cameos from John Cusack, John Travolta, and George
Clooney.
Until now, I've resisted mentioning Saving Private Ryan.  And while I
appreciate the reviews that have not made a comparison between the two
films, I'd like to address it here.  Saving Private Ryan was a film that
affected me initially, and gradually lost its power as I thought about
the numerous contrivances in the story.  Frankly, The Thin Red Line
makes Spielberg's film look like a cartoon.  Malick's picture is far
superior in every way -- he doesn't apologize for war the way Spielberg
does.  He avoids every kind of Hollywood cliche (including the hideous
bookends that Spielberg couldn't resist using).   Saving Private Ryan,
by comparison, looks like it was shot on a soundstage.  The Thin Red
Line never feels that way.  I'm not saying that Spielberg's film is bad
-- no, I think it has a lot to offer.  But Malick's film is more
satisfying in each aspect.
However, I will admit that Saving Private Ryan is easier to approach. 
I don't think The Thin Red Line is for everyone (there were, after all,
numerous walk-outs during my screening).  It's long.  It's slow.  It's
extremely pensive.  But it's also a profound film, both thematically and
visually.  It takes energy to watch it, and it will drain you.  It might
even make you feel dehumanized.  But I don't think anyone can ignore the
power that Malick harnesses here.  I've never seen a better war film
than The Thin Red Line, and, for some reason, I don't think I ever will.

Author
Martin Gruber
Review of "A Thin Red Line" by Martin Gruber      lightwav@ix.netcom.com
How about the first film I've wanted to walk out on this year. Terrence
Malick's wanna-be epic tale of a World War II platoon is both boring and
confusing, and this, his first film in the last 20 years since "Days of
Heaven" is quite a disappointment. 
The problem with the film is that its been done before and offers nothing
new to the audience. We saw shell shocked veterans in the "Deer Hunter" and
"Apocalypse Now", we saw the gore in "Saving Private Ryan", and we saw the
politics and controversy in "Platoon", so why did Malick try to shove it
all into one. He smothers us with poetic philosophy, and drowns us with
"would-be" meanings. 
The only thing good about this film is the fact I honor that the actors
could turn out great performances with such a mediocre script, and the fact
that this film was beautifully shot under the direction of John Toll who
also did "Braveheart" and "The Rainmaker". The ensemble cast would have
made this movie fantastic if it hadn't been for Malick's poor idea,
screenplay and direction. It wasn't just me, after leaving the theater
people were shaking their heads and commenting on how slow and boring it
was. Dragging on forever I give this movie a C-, only because of the great
performances by all the actors who wasted their time with this film.

Author
Dennis Schwartz
THE THIN RED LINE (director: Terrence Malick; cast: Sean Penn, Adrien
Brody, Jim Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson,  Elias
Koteas, Nick Nolte, John C. Reilly, Miranda Otto, Arie Verveen, Dash
Mihok, John Savage, John Travolta, George Clooney, 1998)
 Interestingly enough, during the same year, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN and THE
THIN RED LINE, two epic films about WW11 have come out, each with a
different perspective on the war, a different way of telling it, telling
about a war whose heroes are fading fast in the memories of a country's
conscience, as these men: presumably our dads and grandfathers, the old
gentlemen we might have had a drink or two with, our old boss, or the
fellow who never could quite tell us what happened back then or told us
what happened and we could only refer back to the old-style WW11 movie
for a point of reference. Some of these fellows who are still with us,
are now well into their 70s, 80s, or 90s. They have seen America as it
was and as it is, and now their story seems well-yearned for by the
generations that came after and by the old-timers themselves, as they
try to collect their thoughts and jar their memories, and put back the
pieces of their life that they might never have done before, knowing
full well this may be their last chance to get their story down while
they are still alive to authenticate their experiences of WW11, the
experiences that historians need in order to enliven their subjects,
especially after so much history and changes to the American landscape
has taken place.
The questions remain: are we still the same people? What about our
values, are they the same or have they changed? And, of course, we ask
our politicians, can this country afford to be the policeman for the
world? Just what are our attitudes about war? Both films have tried to
find answers to some of these imponderable questions, but in different
ways. One by trying to paint a realistic picture in our mind of the
horrors of war by showing in detail the bloodshed and sacrifices the men
had to make when trying to comprehend what war was supposed to be like,
as they landed on Omaha Beach during the D-Day invasion, with the
director, Spielberg, not getting side-tracked with the bigger
philosophical questions, there was no controversy over his film's
statements that war is hell; while the other director, Malick, takes a
broader view of things, for the most part, he depersonalizes the
infantrymen fighting in the Guadalcanal war zone, he does it by trying
to be more philosophical and more artistic in his approach to
understanding how mankind is driven into war and forced into shedding
blood.
It seems to me, that Malick tries to do too much and fails to meet his
aims, while Spielberg's  safer approach, using the more plain arguments
against war, easily meets his goals. Therefore, which is the better
film? I would be forced to say Spielberg's. But with all its flaws and
pretensions and trying not to define one war but all wars, Malick takes
more risks, and even if he does not make the better film, he has made
the more interesting one, the one that has a greater "mythos" to it, and
he should be rewarded, somehow, for being the more ambitious filmmaker.
Terrence Malick has a unique set of career moves to his credits, having
graduated from Harvard and been a Rhodes scholar at Oxford, then
becoming a journalist, then teaching philosophy at M.I.T., and
subsequently studying at the American Film Institute. He wrote Pocket
Money (72), and wrote and directed Badlands (73). His last film was made
20 years ago, Days of Heaven (78). All these films were critically
successful. Why he didn't make another film in that time span, I have no
idea. But this film was certainly being looked forward to by the many
cinephiles who have followed his career, perhaps, allowing his long
departure from films to give him too much of an air of mystery for his
own good.
This film is adapted from the James Jones novel, it is close to
three-hours long. In many ways it seems like a discourse on philosophy
that a company of infantrymen in Guadalcanal on August of  '42, acting
as if they were college students analyzing the war being fought, coming
out with the most trite twaddle imaginable, and preposterously doing all
this in the middle of a war zone.
The director also seems to be motivated to record the beauty of nature
with his magnificent camera footage of the area. Very odd, indeed, for a
war film. But then, again, I'm partial to those who think like
philosophers and to the splendors of nature, so I actually loved seeing
the blades of grass blow in the breeze of the azure sky and the wild
flowers abound. I thought the picture was so beautiful to watch, that I
was hypnotized by the lush forests, the wounded hens and the perched owl
and the parrots (I mean the real parrots, not the soldiers parroting the
director's messages). Unfortunately, there were parts of this film that
were so pretentious and out of place, it seemed like it was a film
within a film, a film from another generation placed onto a film of this
generation; perhaps a silent movie, a tribute to the great German
director, Murnau, as the critic Jonathan Rosenbaum suggests. A film that
allows the state of nature to be a pure state undamaged by civilization,
that stays that way until civilized nations bring about their infectious
wars.
I loved this film for being so grandiose and not having to follow the
traditional linear travails of one soldier, but of  following the
collective psyches of Charlie Company, as the men in Charlie became
interchangeable with each other, as well as melting into the landscape.
I appreciate Malick for not caring what any one else might think of how
he filmed it. This was the way Malick was going to make the picture, and
that's that. And I bought into that, for the most part, until I realized
the film ran out of purpose, after its second hour it lost its rhythm
and flow, it had nowhere to go, there were just too many generalizations
to ponder. What I eventually dug out from all the rubble and killing and
messages delivered throughout the film, was that, if there was one thing
you can do in life, it is to find what you want to do, then make an
island for yourself and do what you have to do.This message was
delivered very close to the end of the film, and it seemed like it took
an eternity in coming.
The opening scene, the one which showed a crocodile going into the green
slimy water (Is that supposed to symbolize... Viet-Nam? ... or, a
reminder for us that nature can also be dangerous?) Anyway, some AWOL
soldiers are taken off an ideal Melanesian village in the Solomon
Islands and returned to their military companies so that they can fight
the oncoming war, and so the film takes off from nature's heavenly state
and what ensues are epic battle scenes and a living hell.
The title of the picture signifies that the thin red line is the
crossing point between sanity and madness. And here is where Malick
picks up the story, trying to explain and understand the evil that
results from war, by use of idyllic imagery (no mosquitoes in this film
version of Guadalcanal), and by using the men who he has depersonalized
and, only, humanizing them by allowing us to hear their thinking process
as it is being said aloud to us.
I thought the soldier reading a "Dear John" type of letter was very
emotionally moving, bringing home the point that most of the soldiers
really just want to survive, to get on home. But this film, also, brings
on some pretty heady stuff for these nondescript soldiers to say about
why they are fighting a war and it is all done, for the most part, in
general terms. A voice-over, with a rich Southern accent sets the tone
for the director's ruminations about war, this is done by either
Pvt.Witt (Caviezel) or Bell (Ben Chaplin), it is hard to tell one voice
from the other, as the voice waxes poetic about the bloody action going
down, adding further to the absurdity of what is happening by rambling
on, saying the most philosophical of things, such as, "What keeps us
from reachin' out and graspin' the glory?"  I must confess, you really
had to like this film to listen to that sappy sort of dribble and not
bust a gut.
The juiciest role in the film is reserved for Nolte, who plays a gung-ho
West Point lieutenant Colonel Tall, distraught that he has been passed
over for promotion to general, while younger, less experienced officers
than him get promoted. He justifies his love for this war, by saying
that it is made for him, it is "his" war, it is his chance to get
promoted after all the years of eating shit from all the higher-ups, and
that he is going to do nothing to ruin it, even if it requires his men
to take a hill that will result in tremendous casualties. And the taking
of the hill is the focal point of the film, with its action scenes being
bloody and stupefying. The film also gets caught-up in the grips of
politically motivated reasons why things are done a certain way, as the
C-Company Captain, James Staros (Elias Koteas), questions the colonel's
decision to charge the hill and take its machine gun fortified bunker
that is firing down on his men, saying he has to disobey the order
because he is afraid that it will be a hopeless suicidal bloodbath.
Sean Penn gives an understated performance as the hardened but
compassionate veteran sergeant of C-Company, in a part that many actors
could have played. But he is good in this role, proving he has a wide
range of talent. The screen seems to favor him when he is on it, he
seems to catch our eye, there always seems to be something going on in
his thought process and we want to observe him, we seem to sense that he
is where the action is.
Private Witt is an AWOL soldier in adoration of the native culture and
as a future hero, brought back to the war by Sergeant Welsh (Penn).
Private Bell plays the part of a soldier who only wishes to return
safely to his beautiful wife (Miranda Otto).Travolta has a cameo, that
he is either wrongly cast for or plays it like it should be played, with
an uncomfortable tension, sporting a sleazy moustache, as a young
general full of hubris and political know-how, playing mind games with
the subservient Colonel Tall aboard a transport ship heading for
Guadalcanal. My vote is that he is just right for the part.
This is an easy film to criticize, it has many faults in it, too many to
overcome and make an argument that this film is the ultimate war film
Malick hoped it to be. That it is not. But it is a better film than its
many apparent faults make it seem to be (sappy dialogue and
force-feeding the audience with its self-righteousness and poor pacing
are its worst detractions). I'm always suspicious of films that
pontificate about things they are against and then justify their
bloodiest and goriest parts that draw for them their audience, by
stating that their aims are so lofty that the violence in their films
are artistically justified. This film is no exception, except that I
genuinely felt that there was something strong embedded in this film
that got lost in all its great action scenes and grandeur and
philosophizing, something that creeps up on you as you start thinking
about what was happening to the men in the film, and why they are
fighting a bloody war. What Malick has given us, is a flawed film, that
is visually beautiful and arty, that also allows us to think of war in
its most simple terms, reminding us that we better know what it means to
go to war, or else we will be doomed to keep repeating our past
mistakes. He seems to take no sides,  Japanese or American, they both
got caught in a bad deal.
A 1964 b/w film, director Andrew Marton's The Thin Red Line, used the
same book and title for its film, but you would never know it. Malick's
movie is truly original filmmaking artistry. This film will be long
remembered as a personal film, one that will be well-thought of despite
its flaws. It is a darn shame that it couldn't have been edited better
so that it would make sense for the entire picture, not just for
three-quarters of it.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Walter Frith
The author of 'The Thin Red Line' is the man who wrote the novel that
made for my fourth favourite film of all time, 'From Here to Eternity'. 
I'm talking about James Jones.  Jones' autobiographical 1962 novel, 'The
Thin Red Line', about American bravery, is certainly some of his best
work.  Jones' life was examined somewhat in 1998 in the film 'A
Soldier's Daughter Never Cries' which told the story of a successful
writer from the point of view of one of his children, and the novel on
which it is based was written by Jones' daughter Kaylie.  Jones died of
heart failure in 1977 at the age of 55.  His legacy as one of America's
best contemporary writers is still intact.
If you need twenty years off from the time you made your last film, what
better way to make a comeback than with a war film.  Certainly the most
harrowing of all genres, 1998 serves as a reminder that the greatest
conflict in human history, World War II, never seems to get tiresome and
audiences will pay big money to see stories about it.  'Saving Private
Ryan' decided to make its first half hour better than the rest of the
film but it never faltered for a second and Tom Hanks' performance can
be summed up by asking one question: "Would you want to go to war with
this guy?"  The answer is an overwhelming "yes!"
'The Thin Red Line' marks the return of director Terrence Malick, whose
last film, in 1978, entitled 'Days of Heaven', earned an Oscar for
cinematography, and Malick knows how to visualize his films in an almost
flawless fashion as he plunges his camera into 'The Thin Red Line' and
stirs it around until the picture on the screen comes to a boil. For
many, the film will be considered too graphic and that's just fine. 
Like 'Saving Private Ryan', it details a mission of American soldiers,
this time in the Pacific and details the Guadalcanal conflict which is
one of history's most written about events in dealing with the American
war effort.
Malick uses poetic metaphors in many sequences as a haunting afterglow
instead of any narratives that may have accompanied the film and it
works on several levels but 'The Thin Red Line', in many scenes, is more
about the illustration of motion picture technology than it is about
war.  Too much of the film details battle and not enough attention is
given to characterizations.  How can a war film be truly great unless
you care deeply about its effects on people you've come to know after
some rich character development.  This puts the film in a rather quirky
situation.  Is it disappointing?  No.  It's never boring and it's use of
explosive imagery is impressive for the most part but with a cast of
such noted people as Sean Penn, Nick Nolte, Woody Harrelson and some
lesser known actors, not considered stars but still worth their weight
in talent such as John Cusack, Ben Chaplin, Adrien Brody and Elias
Koteas, 'The Thin Red Line' works only on a superficially modest level
and time will tell if it will obtain classic status.  Some films take
time to be regarded for what they are but others, like 'Saving Private
Ryan', are instantly recognized and are truly the great films.  
Terrence Malick should receive an Oscar nomination as Best Director but
the film probably won't receive a nomination for its script, adapted by
Malick or for Best Picture as it lacks that touch of greatness that
Oscar looks for.  It doesn't have that one talked about scene that will
stir up conversation like the opening battle scene in 'Saving Private
Ryan'.  'The Thin Red Line' is only a series of vignettes strung
together with one big mid section that have a documentary style about
them.
'The Thin Red Line' is excellent film making but only average story
telling and while the latter is clearly more important as an audience
takes it with them through the exit doors at the movie theatre, this
film will still please fans of the war genre, but a lot of them will
only want to view it once.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Alex Sandell
*This review originally appeared at 'The Juicy Cerebellum'.  It is copyright
1999 Alex Sandell/Juicy Cerebellum [All Rights Reserved].  To read the full
review, and others, go to www.juicycerebellum.com*
Where "Apocalypse Now" and "Platoon" were both one man's viewpoint on the
Vietnam war and "Saving Private Ryan" was the story of a handful of men
searching for one, "The Thin Red Line" is a film of every man and his quest to
keep the people around him alive. It weaves through a tapestry of dozens of
men's thoughts, actions and emotions without focusing in on any of them.
Instead, it melds everyone together into a gigantic collective where the
varying opinions add up to one powerful, but flawed, "soul".
Director and screenwriter, Terrence Malick, a Hollywood recluse who left
filmmaking for nearly 20 years after creating two classic films during the
1970s, has turned the second World War into a poem. He finds beauty hiding
under the surface of the grotesque, emotion tucked safely away in those who
claim to be emotionless, and a heart beating freely within a gigantic chest-
cavity which should have been locked for all time. The results are stunning.
The camera weaves through the long grass like a snake as the soldiers work
their way to the top of the hill. As it passes over their heads, we hear some
of their thoughts, we witness their actions and we see how the two oftentimes
conflict. In one scene, a single butterfly enters the film, only to disappear
seconds later. A lot of the actors follow the butterfly's lead.
Nature plays the biggest part in "The Thin Red Line"; everyone else, whether a
big star such as John Travolta, or a virtually unknown actor like Dash Mihok,
are stuck in supporting roles. When they're gone, they're gone, but nature
moves on, as it has always done, never stopping to worry about what it just
lost. Does this make nature inherently evil? As a part of nature, is that evil
inside of us? If so, one of the more philosophical soldiers wonders, who
planted the seed?
And that's where the trouble begins. There has never been a perfect war
movie. Each one stumbles over its own ideologies and/or pretensions. "The
Thin Red Line" is no exception. Most of the thoughts and philosophies spewed
out during the film sound contrived and juvenile; tired and weak. We've heard
all this before. I don't know if this was intentional on the part of the
screenwriter (trying to emulate the way a young man under tons of pressure
would try to make sense of it all), or if he just eats lots of fortune
cookies and needed somewhere to throw out these wonderful observations found
inside the sugary shell. Surprisingly enough, another negative aspect of the
film were the cameo roles played by John Travolta, George Clooney and Woody
Harrelson. Having noticeable stars popping in and out of the movie distracted
us from the point it was trying to make, and the parts could have been played
just as easily by an unknown. Finally, at nearly three hours, the film is too
long. Malick seems to lose his sense of direction during the last forty-five
minutes, and begins to wander aimlessly from scene to scene, not knowing
quite when to end the film that began as a classic.
That being said, the pros definitely outweigh the cons, and with the
wonderful directing, acting and cinematography which was already in place, it
would have taken just a little more work to make "The Thin Red Line" the
perfect war movie that a lot of people have been waiting for. As it is, it
stands as a brilliant film and one of the best war movies ever made. -Alex
Sandell
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Brandon Stahl
Written and Directed by Terrence Malick
Based upon the book by James Jones
Poetry, translated into a film, is The Thin Red Line. The movie is a
collection of images and thoughts, assembled in a broken order, in hopes to
solicit emotion and feeling from the audience. It is not so much about plot
or story, but about sights and sounds, symbolism and rich lyrics, and the
way a it should feel to be in a war. Malick created poetry. 
The question is: Is it good or bad poetry? Unfortunately, I'm not a good
enough critic to say. I didn't enjoy the movie, but that's partly because I
didn't understand Malick's poetry. I have to be honest. That's not say that
someone will understand Malick's visions and enjoy the experience. I didn't
enjoy the film, because I didn't understand Malicks message, but I also
thought that it was incredibly overlong and pretentious. What insights did I
gain through his film that other war movies had already shown? None, and it
took three hours to do it. 
Malick uses the war as a background to introduce several American
infantrymen, most of them indistinguishable from the other. It wasn't so
much about keeping track of each character and their individual plight in
the movie. Each character had moments where, as they were fighting or dying,
would have a voice over narration of poetry. Lines that didn't deal with
war, but with other topics surrounding - individuality, human cruelty,
weakness, pity. All of those are topics related to war, but the lines zigged
around the war. A battle would be waged, meanwhile a character reflects upon
his usefulness to others. Is this what war feels like? I don't know, I've
never been. Who am I to say? But by placing these voice overs all over the
film, the poetry was forced. Rather than letting the dialogue and action
shape the characters, the voiceovers were relentless and tiresome. A few
would have made a point, kept it emotional. After awhile it seemed
satirical. I just never felt that soldiers could act that enlightened during
battle. 
The movie looked good. Malick created a heaven in the hills where the
soldiers attacked, then destroyed it through battle. The battle scenes
seemed fine, though only one section really stood out - a sequence where the
American soldiers were chasing the Japanese through a village. The camera
was frenzied, never resting on anything to grab ahold of. One of the moments
that didn't seemed forced. 
I'm sure this is the worst, most incomplete review I have ever written. I've
been searching for the way to critique this movie, and without fully
comprehending it I'm unsure how a complete critique could be done. Perhaps
as I write more reviews and get better at this process, I'll revisit the
film and write another review. Or perhaps I'm right: if it is poetry that
Malick created with The Thin Red Line who am I to judge his poetry? 

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
_The Thin Red Line_ is a war film, based on the series of events that
led to the takeover of the island of Guadecanal.  It has an all-star
cast, an epic running time, many intermingling stories, and stunning
cinematography.  The film+s strengths are that it is stunningly
beautiful, and that it is deeply philosophical.  It+s weakness is an
incoherence that starts slow, and builds throughout the film.
If I have been slow in reviewing this film, here+s why:  For the longest
time I+ve waited for it to hit my area.  Now that I+ve seen it, my only
desire is to see it again.
Usually, that would be a blurb of great praise.  Not here.  I would want
to see it again so that maybe then, I would "get it."  It seems to be
very poetic, very visual, very philosophical, deeply complicated, and
too abstract.
But it+s not fair for me to criticize the film for going over my head at
points.  It+s not fair for me to complain that I could not keep up with
the rhythm of Terence Malick+s direction.  He may have made it a little
harder to follow, a little less dumbed down, but I wasn+t bored. (Okay,
I was bored a little towards the very end).
The film isn+t overtly graphic like _Saving Private Ryan_, but there are
some strong violent moments.  It+s more concerned with the deeper,
underlying issues of man versus nature.  Of man in a tribal state, being
more peaceful than the "civilized" counterpart.  There+s one phenomenal
image where a tribesman walks through the bushes, totally oblivious to
the infantry walking towards him.
There are many of these phenomenal images.  The only thing that is
lacking is the glue of a concrete story.  But it+s not that the story
doesn+t exist.  The story takes on many forms, affects many characters,
and doesn+t assume that we need to have it all explained for us.  It+s
not conventional, it+s not Hollywood, and it+s not dull.  I could only
hope that repeated viewings will improve my moviegoing experience.

Author
Christopher Null
     Terrence Malick's long-awaited and severely overhyped LINE is
plenty red, but it isn't thin at all.  In fact, it's damn thick and
dense, and it meanders about like a lazy river.
     At almost three hours, THE THIN RED LINE burns long and slow, and
fully a third of the movie is completely wasted on surrealistic, bizarre
voice-overs that do little but confuse what is an otherwise running
theme in the film: War blows.
     But Malick is a hermitic auteur, and as such, he must be allowed to
do as he pleases.  So, for example, instead of seeing the film-and the
war-only through the eyes of its central character, Jack Witt
(Cavaziel), we are treated to behind-the-brain looks at a half-dozen
other characters, too.  And they all pretty much agree that WWII is a
real pisser, for some reason or another.
     Not that LINE is without its strengths, the middle third is a juicy
look at the horrors of the war in the Pacific and the power plays of
military officers.  But, sadly, much of LINE is a simple vanity project,
not just for Malick but also for the dozens of name-brand stars
involved.  Witness John Travolta and George Clooney in blatant
I-flew-in-for-the-afternoon one-scene appearances.  Such star quality
and behind-the-scenes hype will do a lot to woo critics and Oscar
voters... at the expense of truly good filmmaking.
     The movie's camerawork and performances by Cavaziel, Chaplin, Penn,
Koteas, and Cusack should not be overlooked, and Nolte's put-upon Lt.
Colonel is a memorable piece of work.  But as for the silly metaphysical
script that invents more English language constructs than it adheres
to... well, let's just say that the importance of a good story editor
can't be stressed heavily enough.
Director: Terrence Malick
Producer: Robert Michael Geisler, Grant Hill, John Roberdeau
Writer: Terrence Malick
Starring: Sean Penn, Adrien Brody, James Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, George
Clooney, John Cusack, Woody Harrelson, Elias Koteas, Jared Leto, Nick
Nolte
http://www.foxmovies.com/thinredline/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
M. Armstrong
Director: Terrence Malick
Writer: Terrence Malick (based on the novel The Thin Red Line by James Jones)
Director of Photography: John Toll
Featuring: Sean Penn, Jim Caviezel, Ben Chaplin, Nick Nolte, Elias Koteas,
Woody Harrelson, John Cusack.
It has been 20 years since a Terrence Malick film hit theaters. His new film,
The Thin Red Line, is a strange, beautiful, enigmatic mess of a movie. 
The first thing that jumps out to one when they see the advertisements for
this film is the huge cast. It is filled with above-the-title stars. The cast,
for the most part, gives great performances. John Travolta, whose role is
nothing more than a cameo, seems not to have attacked his performance with that
much verve. George Clooney, whose role became a cameo in editing, gives a
strange performance. One wonders if he knew that his performance would become
the object of ridicule through a character's narration. The rest of the cast,
especially Nick Nolte and Elias Koteas, are unambiguously fantastic. These
actors (and they are, with two exceptions, men) were lured by the name of
Malick. 
Terrence Malick is a cinematic legend. He has often been called "The J.D.
Salinger of cinema." His two previous films, Badlands and Days of Heaven, are
spectacularly beautiful and obscure motion pictures. After he made them, he
disappeared for 20 years. This film marks his return. What he's made with The
Thin Red Line is a film that seems less concerned with plot than with the
emotion of the moment. The narration which fills the film (and perplexes many)
not only lets us hear the narrators (the characters themselves) pontificate,
but also lets us hear such of-the-moment thoughts as "I'm scared." The rather
simple plot of The Thin Red Line is used as a canvas on which many stories are
painted. The plot couldly simply be boiled down to an assault on a hill. A plot
synopsis for The Thin Red Line is difficult, because the story is fractured.
Many stories are here, from the clash between the Lieutenant (Elias Koteas) and
the savage Colonel (a voracious Nick Nolte) to the private (Ben Chaplin) who
uses his love for the woman he left behind to keep him going. The fracturing of
the story is ultimately a fault. It is as if an artist spent an incredible
amount of time artfully sculpting tiny statues and then threw them into a box,
shook the box, and poured the results onto a table. This basically creates a
mess, but the stories can be discerned and enjoyed. 
I'm not declaring that the film has no structure. While Saving Private Ryan
used warfare to bookend the plot, Malick uses reflection and glorious shots of
nature to bookend about 90 minutes of combat. The battles in The Thin Red Line
are astonishing and display a mastery of filmmaking. The astounding
cinematography in this film must also be given notice. This film uses color and
light in such a fantastic way, that it will be sad to see it degraded when it
has to bee transferred to video.
Ultimately, Malick has crafted a film that is a movie that enjoys looking
through the treetops more than regarding the war that rages below them. The
film is filled with nature photography and the regarding of nature. While some
have said that the anti-war message and pro-nature tubthumping was juvenile, it
was done with so much complexity and thought, that it cannot ever honestly be
called childish. 
After seeing The Thin Red Line, I was haunted by it and am quite ready to see
it again.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Terrence Malick, adapted from the James Jones novel
Starring: Jim Caviezel, Sean Penn, Elias Koteas, Nick Nolte
Synopsis:
In this nontraditional film an American World War II army company is
ordered to assault an important hill on Guadalcanal that is held by
desperate and starving Japanese soldiers manning machine gun nests at
the top of the hill. The movie jumps disjointedly from one soldier to
another in order to expose inner thoughts, fears, flashbacks, and
philosophies. Two of its main themes are that war is surreal and
accomplishes nothing, and that all men are really facets of the same
oneness that pervades nature and the universe.
Opinion:
Watching THE THIN RED LINE is a little bit like seeing a seeing a three
hour slide show and hearing a poetry reading. The cinematography is
extraordinary, and the thoughts are mystical and deep. However, don't
expect a traditional story line or resolution because the THIN RED LINE
is more of a film experience than a story. The whole idea is to portray
the mindlessness of war. The good die with the bad. Men enter and leave
and are replaced like machinery. Savagery exists side by side with
nature's beauty. Each person must make sense of it on their own.
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
THE THIN RED LINE
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Sean Penn, Ben Chaplin, Jim Caviezel, Arie Verveen, Elias
Koteas, Nick Nolte, Woody Harrelson, Dash Mihok, Adrien Brody.
Screenplay:  Terrence Malick, based on the novel by James Jones.
Producers:  Robert Michael Geisler & John Roberdeau and Grant Hill.
Director:  Terrence Malick.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, profanity, brief nudity, adult themes)
Running Time:  168 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The announcement that THE THIN RED LINE would mark Terrence Malick's
return to the director's chair after a twenty year absence was greeted as
the cinematic equivalent of J. D. Salinger popping open his Smith-Corona
to give it another go.  This was, after all, the hermit-genius of Great
American Movie-Making, whose only two previous films -- BADLANDS and DAYS
OF HEAVEN -- were spoken of in tones of reverence.  Yet try as I might, I
couldn't work up the same enthusiasm.  As adept as Malick was at crafting
stunning visuals, narrative seemed to be an afterthought to him, something
to be cobbled together with voice-over narration.  Good films, yes, and
profoundly beautiful ones, but not profound ones.
     Malick reaches for profundity once again in THE THIN RED LINE; the
result is another good, great-looking tone poem where deep thoughts stand
in the way of genuine drama.  Based on James Jones' 1962 novel, it tells
the tale of the 1942-43 World War II Guadalcanal campaign through the eyes
of several members of a U.S. Army rifle company called C-for-Charlie.
Malick weaves his way through the minds and eyes of several characters as
C-for-Charlie prepares for its first action, including:  company commander
Capt. Staros (Elias Koteas), an officer concerned about his men; Lt. Col.
Tall (Nick Nolte), the batallion commander who sees this campaign as a
career-making opportunity; Pvt. Witt (Jim Caviezel), an idealist who
repeatedly goes AWOL; Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn), whose cynicism hides a
heart; and Pvt. Bell (Ben Chaplin), whose every thought is focused on his
wife back home.
     It's instantly clear that Malick intends to take THE THIN RED LINE in
a very different direction from Jones' novel.  Jones, while he frequently
found his way into the heads of his characters, was equally concerned with
providing a vivid sense of the physical -- the oppressive heat and
humidity, the boots full of water, and the insect attacks that challenged
the men on Guadalcanal before a single shot was fired.  For long stretches
of THE THIN RED LINE, Malick seems to forget that these characters have
bodies at all. The narration captures the men thinking about God, about
the nature of evil, about their lives and loves.  The incessant koan-like
philosophizing becomes aggravating enough, but it's even more frustrating
that every one of the men, from the law school-educated Staros to
Kentucky-bred farm boy Witt, thinks in the same college-sophomore-on-a-
double-bong-hit, my-fingernail-could-be-a-whole-nother-universe terms.
With only a couple of notable exceptions -- Bell's obsessive love for his
wife, and Tall's careerist self-loathing -- Malick's internal monologues
turn the characters into an indistinct jumble of existential angst.
     Ironically, THE THIN RED LINE is at its best when it does get down
and dirty, following the company's assault on a well-defended Japanese
hill position.  It's a superb piece of kinetic war film-making, the camera
bursting through tall grass as soldiers are cut down during a suicidal
head-on attack.  It is here, during the heat of battle, that Malick finds
his most affecting and insightful moments:  a platoon sergeant (Woody
Harrelson) facing a greater threat from his own carelessness than from the
enemy; Doll reacting to his first kill; Staros and Tall facing off over a
risky attack order.  There's more poetry and insight as the men discover
what battle will make of them than there is in an hour's worth of
navel-gazing and heavy-handed juxtapositions of war ("bad") and nature
("good").
     There's little question that THE THIN RED LINE is an aesthetic
wonder, shot by John Toll in fickle available light and edited into a
wartime KOYAANISQATSI.  And it all might have worked much better if Malick
had let viewers draw their own messages from the images, rather than
letting a soldier inform us that "war don't ennoble men...it turns 'em
into dogs, poisons the soul."  Even that tactic might have worked better
if the voices had been distinctive, or if there were some exploration of
esprit de corps which connected these men to one another.  Each character
in THE THIN RED LINE is living too squarely inside his own head to connect
much with anyone else.  That sentiment applies to Terrence Malick as well,
who returns from his two decade sabbatical for three hours of stunningly
photographed, overwrought introspection.

Author
Joy Wyse
There are not very many veterans of World War II alive today and those
are at least seventy years of age.  To most viewers of The Thin Red Line
the battles of Guadalcanal seem to have merely lasted a few days instead
of the long, bloody, dragged- out siege that it was.
Director Malick has tried to convey the futility of war through the eyes
and reactions of the soldiers, particularly those of Private Fife who has
come to love and appreciate the native life of the pre-battle islanders. 
Using flashbacks Malick jumps from savage shooting to children swimming
underwater, and back again.  There are too many of these cutaway shots.  A
little symbolism goes a long way.
Many of the `stars' who appear are nothing more than cameos.  John
Travolta, portraying the General in charge, looks surprisingly reminiscent
of John Hodiak, a handsome star of the WWII era.  George Clooney has but
one scene as well.  It is said that his role was longer, but was cut. 
Bill Pullman is there, too, but don't blink or you'll miss him.  He says
nothing.
One of the best vignettes is by Woody Harrelson as a well-trained and
dedicated career soldier.  His act of heroism is so well enacted that it's
almost overlooked for what it is.
Others have lauded Nick Nolte, as the psychotic colonel who is determined
to secure the `hill' despite the costs, as an Oscar caliber role.  It is
almost one-dimensional, however, and Sean Penn'' portrayal of the sergeant
serving under his command, is much better.
Some of the best acting is from the unknown actors.  Adrien Brody, Jim
Caviezel and Ben Chaplin are standouts.  Their characters seem a bit
confusing at times as they resemble each other and all those uniforms are
alike.  Even the officers forego wearing insignia.  It is especially
difficult to identify some of the voice-over narration.
Several of the scenes are unusually disturbing such as the American GI
who carries pliers with him to extricate gold teeth from the deadand
dying. And there are the dogs feasting on the corpses.
It is very long, needlessly long and so I only give it a B-. I don't want
to see it again, and neither does my husband, a WWII veteran.

Author
Peter Reiher
"The Thin Red Line" is a fine example of a failure of vision, a rather
rare failing in American film.  Writer/director Terrence Malick
reached too far and tried for too much.  As a result, his film works
in places, but fails as a whole.
The story concerns an Army company assigned to assist in clearing
Japanese troops out of the island of Guadalcanal in World War II.  The
company must land on a possibly fortified beach and seize a key ridge
that commands an important airfield.  Many men will clearly die in the
effort.
This story would normally be told in a rather straightforward way, as
indeed it was in the previous (rather weak) adaptation of the James
Jones novel the film is based on.  Malick uses a different approach,
which has more in common with the literary than with classical film
methods.  Malick's presentation starts with a lengthy pre-invasion
sequence that seems at first to suggest an anthropological
documentary, and then to suggest that a particular character, Pvt.
Witt (Jim Caviezel), will be a focus for the film.  Witt is a natural
rebel who curiously seems to be both completely out of place and
comfortably at home in the Army.  But Malick quickly moves on to
sketch a dozen or so other characters at various levels of detail,
with the deepest treatment reserved for Pvt. Bell (Ben Chaplin), a
former officer whose love of his wife lead to his resignation and
later drafting; and Battalion commander Col. Tall (Nick Nolte), an
overage officer who seethes with hidden rage at being passed over for
promotion and plans to prove his worth with the upcoming battle.
Malick deploys several of his major cinematic devices early.  We see
many shots of nature, especially the exotic animals and plants of the
South Seas.  These recur throughout the film, occasionally in integral
portions of the story, but more often as side comments on the
proceedings.  Malick also begins the use of voice overs to reveal
characters' internal thoughts.  Many of the film's characters speak to
us in voice over throughout.  Finally, Malick introduces flashbacks to
the earlier lives of a couple of the characters.  The device is used
most heavily for Pvt. Bell.
These devices are central to Malick's presentation, and clearly served
as organizing principles for the entire work.  The other major
elements shaping the work are Malick's intention to present the events
of the film as influences on his characters, rather than as a plot
that the characters move forward; and his desire to incorporate
different perspectives into the film.  Malick clearly intends them to
serve his greater end, which is to investigate how men choose to live
their lives and why those choices so often lead to disaster.  Unlike
so many films, this film's structure, down to fairly fine details, was
clearly well thought out and planned in the mind of a director who saw
in his mind's eye what he wanted.
The vision of the mind's eye is not always as clear as one might hope.
The devices Malick deploys often fail, and they ultimately sink the
film.  The interminable pre-invasion sequence drags the film down.  By
the time Malick has gotten his men on the beach, many viewers will
already have written the film off.  Malick's use of voice over, with
multiple characters thinking deep thoughts, is bold but ineffective.
Too often we are uncertain which of the many characters is sharing his
thoughts with us.  Worse, too often those thoughts are expressed in
pretentious language that seems highly unlikely to inhabit the minds
of the characters.  When they are far more likely to be thinking "how
the hell am I going to get out of this alive," we hear them discussing
fine philosophical points in language more suited to poetry than the
heat of combat.
The flashbacks are similarly distracting, especially those to Pvt.
Bell's marriage.  Malick shows us these scenes incessantly, often at
key moments in the action.  The effect is to convince us that Bell's
obsession with his wife is very, very important, and will be key to
the action, or the theme of the film, or understanding important
character developments.  Ultimately, it proves to be none of these.
Far too little in the film comes of this obsession to justify the time
spent on it, and, worse, the breakup in the continuity of the action.
I presume Malick understood this and did it anyway for some specific
reason, but that reason is unclear to me.
Malick's choice to render Jones' book in fuller complexity than is
typical of adaptations also leads to a shifting focus among the
characters.  It takes quite a while to determine just which of them
are going to be important.  In typical Hollywood films, the shorthand
for handling this problem is to cast famous actors, or at least
familiar faces, in most of the important roles.  But in "The Thin Red
Line," not only do stars play small, trivial roles (George Clooney's
role seems especially pointless), but familiar faces like John Savage
and John C. Reilly crop up in parts that ultimately are of little
consequence.  Nothing says that a director has to use the conventional
methods to sort out confusion, but if he doesn't use those methods, he
needs some other method.  Malick either denies the requirement or his
methods failed.  It takes a long time to determine who is who here,
and some of the characters never really achieve any clear separation
from the others.
These choices harm the film.  And that's a tremendous shame, as the
film has some extremely strong elements.  In addition to the most
obvious (excellent cinematography), several performances are very
strong.  Nolte and Elias Koteas deserve the greatest honors here, as
they manage to convey clear characters and relationships in the face
of the confusions of the rest of the film.  Other actors, like Sean
Penn and Jim Caviezel, do well enough, but it seems like Malick has
left out key scenes or important information that would bring strong
individual moments together into a coherent performance.  There are
clear elements of a strong, important contrast between these two
characters, but the film comes just short of clarifying that contrast.
The center section of the film (in itself, as long as a conventional
film) is powerful.  This section, which has the clearest focus,
concerns an assault on a strongly held ridge and its immediate
aftermath.  Malick stages this section of the film brilliantly,
managing to make clear the complexities of the combat while
simultaneously showing the chaos of its execution.  His use of
locations is particularly strong here.  The hills the troops must
climb are covered with shoulder-high grass, and Malick uses this and
other topographical features to convey the terror of the unknown that
troops must feel when assaulting an enemy position.  You never know
whether, in the next moment, the grass will part to reveal just more
grass, or the enemy about to kill you.  Death strikes from afar, as
unseen machine guns suddenly end lives.
Unfortunately, Malick still has more than half an hour's material
after this sequence is completed.  He ultimately has one more climax
he wishes to show, but the dramatic timing used to transition from the
aftermath of the attack to this sequence is stilted.  The film seems
like it's going to end several times, only to go on.
Malick is also to be praised for his fairness in treating his
characters.  The most obvious instance is how the Japanese, initially
little more than deadly ciphers, become extremely human and
sympathetic on closer examination.  But Malick gives the same
treatment to other characters, as well.  Nolte's obsessive Colonel,
who forces assaults that seem suicidal and has too little concern for
the welfare of his men, ultimately is shown to have made the correct
military choices, and, more surprisingly, to have more compassion for
the tragedy of the battle than one would have expected.
Many critics have said that "The Thin Red Line" improves greatly on
second viewing, as the viewer now has a better idea of what to expect.
Perhaps that's true.  However, on first viewing "The Thin Red Line"
plays as an exceedingly ambitious failure with some strong
compensating virtues.  As such, it's definitely worth seeing, but only
for those willing to accept a different approach to film than one
traditionally sees, and those willing to overlook some fairly large
flaws.

Author
Susan Granger
Writer/director Terrence Malick, known as the J.D. Salinger of
the movies, is the near-mythic Harvard graduate, Rhodes Scholar,
former journalist and philosophy professor who has exiled himself from
Hollywood's film industry for nearly two decades after making
"Badlands" and "Days of Heaven." Now he's back with this screen
adaptation of James Jones' novel about the men in an Army Rifle
company, C-for-Charlie, who suffer and change, making psychological
discoveries about themselves, as they attempt to capture a Japanese
base on an island in the South Pacific during the W.W.II battle of
Guadalcanal. The casts consists of Sean Penn (a cynical sergeant),
Nick Nolte (an ambitious officer), Elias Koteas (their
conscience-stricken leader), Woody Harrelson (a doomed sergeant), John
Cusack (a self-sacrificing captain), John Travolta (with a mustache)
George Clooney (in a cameo), with Ben Chaplin and newcomer Jim
Caviezel as the two pivotal privates. Filmed in Port Douglas, a
coastal community near Australia's Great Barrier Reef, the
cinematography is filled with sweeping imagery and the story is
punctuated with fierce bursts of energy and as Malick explores how the
various men confront fear. While his sense of irony and humanity is
evident, Malick's abstract, emotionally detached style just doesn't
seem to mesh with the structured urgency of a combat tale. The pace is
ponderous, filled with contemplative, philosophical musings about God
and nature and the insanity of war. Malick's metaphors are often
opaque in meaning and pretentious, if not condescending, as dialogue,
like "The closer you are to Caesar, the greater the fear." On the
Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "The Thin Red Line" is a meditative 7,
a bizarre war movie.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
The Thin Red Line is a spectacular movie, intelligently written and
directed by supergenius Terrence Malick, and don't let anyone tell you
different.  Like no other film, it shows the passionate futility of war,
the dark side of mankind, and the stark, underappreciated beauty of
elephant grass.  Brilliantly acted, with haunting, eloquent voiceovers
supplementing the gritty, realistic pace, The Thin Red Line is a courageous
movie which will be studied by generations of film students.  Only an
ingrate, a person with no appreciation for truly great cinema, could ever
say bad things about this instant classic.  If a critic comes along who
doesn't like this movie, who doesn't appreciate its preeminent place in
film history, he should be forced to leave the country and eat taro root in
Guadalcanal until he regains his senses.
Or so the fans of this movie say.  Me, I'm packing my bags and wondering if
Tabasco makes taro root taste any better.  The Thin Red Line is
overserious, overlong, and over my head.  It is ostensibly the story of a
WWII infantry company fighting for control of Guadalcanal, but don't be
fooled into thinking that this is Saving Private Ryan in the Pacific
Theater.  The Thin Red Line is overlaid with symbolism and philosophy to
the point that it makes Platoon look like The Green Berets.  In this movie,
Higher Truths fly past faster than bullets.
This is not to say that I did not take any Higher Truths away from The Thin
Red Line.  I did.  Out of all the high-flown sentiment, all the stunning
visual jungle imagery, all the scenes of heroism, courage, and sudden
violent death, I left The Thin Red Line with one truth:  Don't take small
children to movies that have explosions in them.
Ha-ha!  And I could go on, poking cruel and heartless fun at Terrence
Malick and The Thin Red Line for the next three hours (or until some nice
person from the Miami Herald taps me on the shoulder and mentions that Dave
Barry is sick this week, and can I have a column ready by 5 this
afternoon?).  But it would be incredibly rude and mean-spirited of me to do
so.  (Although, come to think of it, that hasn't stopped me so far.)  The
Thin Red Line is a great movie whether I like it or not.  (So is Saving
Private Ryan, for that matter.)  It is a matter of taste, that's all, and
if my taste isn't broad enough to encompass this boring, pretentious,
pointless clunker of a movie, so be it.
Before going to see The Thin Red Line, you need to understand that it is
actually three one-hour movies all spliced together.  If you like at least
any two of them, you're going to enjoy the movie.  If you only like one of
them, however, you're in for a long stretch over some rough road.
The first movie is the one I liked best, and the one I was expecting.  It
is the War Epic, complete with all-star cast and on-location filming.  I
love war epics.  I love all the great epic WWII movies like The Longest Day
and The Great Escape and Bridge on the River Kwai and all of the others.
And this third of the movie is spectacular.  It has Woody Harrelson leading
his team in a desperate assault on a Japanese-held hill, only to make a
tragic error.  It has Nick Nolte in the John Wayne part, pushing the
company up that hill by force of pure will -- along with Elias Koteas as
the decent infantry captain who opposes him, not wanting to throw away the
lives of his troops.  And it has a lot of good, young actors playing in
minor roles, building their resumes.
There are two great scenes in The Thin Red Line that help put all of these
movies to shame.  There's a scene where an infantry squad (led by John
Cusack, of all people) has to take out a Japanese machine gun battery on
top of a hill.  The company has inched painfully up this gorgeous hill
covered in leafy elephant grass for a good chunk of the movie, but has
suffered a lot of casualties from the unseen machine gun nests ahead.  The
scene where Cusack's team charges up the hill and takes the nest is a
great, courageous, almost wordless piece of filmmaking.  You understand
exactly what's going on and where the armies are situated and the sheer
guts it would take for anyone to trot over to a machine gun emplacement and
lob in a grenade.  There's another great scene at the two hour mark where
the company overruns a Japanese barracks and hospital.  It is a scene of
terror and desperation, almost as good as Spielberg's D-Day landing, and
much more fast-paced.  Malick does an outstanding job in conveying the
chaos and fear that both sides must have experienced...  but it's the last
good scene in the movie, which still has an hour to run.
The second movie is, of all things, a nature documentary.  There are scenes
-- dozens of them -- that look for all the world like they were snipped
from a National Geographic special on Guadalcanal.  If you have cable, and
want to get an idea about what The Thin Red Line is all about, click back
and forth between The History Channel and The Discovery Channel and you'll
have some idea.  The movie's opening scene is an alligator sliding, slowly,
into a filthy pond.  And it looks great, from a purely visual perspective,
but a whole hour of such images gets to be a bit oppressive.  And it really
doesn't help matters that Malick is so good at his craft.  There's a shot
of some bats at one point, and I will concede that it may be the best, most
poetic, most lovingly crafted film rendition of bats ever made.  But --
ingrate that I am -- if I want to see bats, I can find better ways to
manage it than paying to see The Thin Red Line again.
The third movie stitches the other two together.  It is, at least partly, a
debate about philosophy -- how the beauty of Rousseau's "state of nature"
is destroyed and tarnished by a nasty and brutish Hobbsean war.  Whatever.
It is told largely by director Malick in a series of moody, pointless
voiceovers.  It is as though Malick is one of the angels in long black
leather coats from City of Angels, drifting around Guadalcanal the way that
Nicolas Cage drifted around Los Angeles, hearing the thoughts of the dying
and of brave men, hearing the ineffable music in the sunset.  What was
magical in City of Angels is, well, wretched in A Thin Red Line.  (Or vice
versa.  Like I said, it's a matter of taste.)  The voiceovers are overlong,
incomprehensible ramblings about life, death, nature, eternity, and some
blonde chick back home.  This all may be deeply profound, inspired
thinking, but I thought it was boring as hell.
A Thin Red Line is almost exactly like the Olympics, in one way.  You have
a great, exciting contest between men and teams of men, with national honor
at stake.  But every so often, when you're not paying attention, the
coverage switches to gymnastics or figure skating or women's volleyball or
some such other event.  It's not so much that the other events are bad or
evil or something worse than the complete waste of time that they are.
It's that every minute they're on the screen is another minute we're not
watching basketball or hockey or the decathlon.  And in The Thin Red Line,
every minute we spend listening to the deep inner thoughts of howler
monkeys or what have you is a minute that can't be used to show the Battle
of Guadalcanal, which is what we came to see.
In grading The Thin Red Line, I give the battle scenes an A, and the rest
of the movie an F.  That averages out to a C in my book, although I'm
confident that my mean-spirited rant will not detract from the greatness of
this movie.  If anyone needs me, I'll be watching a hockey game.  And
eating taro root.
MovieNation:  Movie Reviews in Black and White
http://members.xoom.com/movienation
movienation@xoommail.com
"No children have ever meddled with the Republican Party
and lived to tell about it."  -- Sideshow Bob

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     "There's only a thin red line between the sane and the mad."  That
is supposedly an old Midwestern saying. From it James Jones took the
title of his semi-autobiographical novel based on his experiences in
the Infantry Company C on Guadalcanal.  That book was adapted into a
movie by Andrew Marton in 1964. Now Terrence Malick, who has not made a
film for two decades but who made the moody BADLANDS and DAYS OF
HEAVEN, has filmed it a second time.
     The story follows Company C and their experiences on Guadalcanal.
There is very little real plot for a film of this length, about three
hours.  Basically the film simply has a company of soldiers comes to
the island, has a hard fight against the Japanese, and finally leaves.
We get to know the characters through their interaction and hearing
their thoughts on the soundtrack.  Their thoughts may well be accurate
to the novel, but they are a little too poetic to be believed.
     Commanding the action in Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (played by Nick
Nolte).  Tall is a bitter man past the age when most men retire from
command but wanting to have command in a battle to prove himself.  "The
closer you are to Caesar the greater the fear," Tall thinks to himself.
It is not entirely clear what he means by that, but it is the sort of
think most of the soldiers seem to think to themselves.  One soldier
Bell (Ben Chaplin) thinks endlessly about his wife and we have inter-
cut dreamlike scenes of her and of the two of them together.  He has
turned her into sort of the idealized woman.  He remembers her over and
over, her and his memories of telling her that if anything will happen
to him, "I will wait for you on the other side of the dark waters."  It
is hard to believe GIs talked or thought like this.
     The film goes from one character to the next as we hear their
thoughts and see how they react to the experience.  There are plot
developments, like a conflict between Tall and commanding Captain
Staros (Elias Koteas), but the point of the film is mood, not to tell a
story.  One of the problems with THE THIN RED LINE is that it is hard
to keep so many characters straight on a single viewing.  The names are
new and so are most of the important faces.  And it does not help that
the viewer that he is seeing them in army helmets that cover up the top
part of the head.  There are some major stars in this film, but
frequently they will appear in what amount to cameo roles.  John
Travolta and George Clooney appear in one scene each. Sean Penn is
recognizable and has a larger role as a nasty sergeant who tells an
idealistic soldier, "We are living in a world where man is trying to
blow himself up as fast as he can arrange it.  Just shut your eyes and
take it."  Frequently we are shut out of what is really happening.  In
one case we see one of the soldiers on the transport yelling for a door
to be opened, but are given no explanation what that is all about.
     The film is an uneasy balance of style and realism.  While the
scenes of battle are very realistic, much of the credibility is
sacrificed by having the characters think in the free verse we hear in
the voice-overs. Somehow it is not believable that when a soldier is in
great danger, tracking through the high grass, constantly on the
lookout for an enemy who could appear at any time, that he thinks in
poetry.  Far more than the novel, the film takes advantage of its
location in the Melanesia tropical forest.  Some of the nature
photography is top notch.  The film opens with an extended image of a
crocodile submerging into water, giving the nature a sinister side.  It
is inviting but deadly.  One interviewed veteran I have heard soldier
says that he does not remember there being as much high grass but the
sound editor uses it to create a lush feel to the film.  Hans Zimmer,
who has scored several films with African themes over the past several
years, has provided a score that sounds as African as anything he has
written.  Whether this sound is authentic to the Solomon Islands is
questionable.
     The film is a powerful experience, one that undoubtedly captures
much of the feel of battle in a new hyper-realistic style.  But much
of the film does not work or at least requires multiple viewings to
take in.  I rate the film 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.
     The stories in THE THIN RED LINE are from the point of view of
soldier who did not see "the big picture."  This film had little of the
actual history surrounding this battle.  Here is what was missing from
the film.  In 1942 Japanese military spearheaded south and captured the
Solomon Islands, bringing the war almost to Australia's doorstep.
Queensland, Australia, was just 1000 miles to the southwest.  It was
vitally important to the Japanese that they disrupt Allied Forces in
the area or they would be pushed easily back out.  To avoid this they
needed a base from which to launch air attacks against Allied supply
lines.  They built their air base on Guadalcanal Island.  New Evidence
suggests that as early as five years previously, and before the war
started, they had planned for what they saw was the coming war and were
stocking Guadalcanal to hold the island.
     On August 7, 1942, the day the United States had been in the war
only eight months, the United States sent in 6000 Marines to capture
the island, never expecting it would be a major battle.  Repeatedly
each side brought in reinforcements as the battle grew, first one side
and then the other.  The fighting spread from the island to a navy
battle in the surrounding sea.  The Japanese were well-entrenched and
very difficult to dislodge.  The natural protections of the Japanese
and the malarial jungles took a heavy toll on the Allies. The Allied
forces here were 90% American.  The fighting extended from August 1942
to January 1943. Naval superiority eventually decided the battle for
the Americans.
     The effect upon the Pacific War was profound.  There were 1600
Americans killed and another 4200 wounded.  There were 7100 casualties
in total.  But the Japanese losses were more terrible.  There were
14,000 Japanese killed or wounded.  Another 9000 died of disease or
starvation.  About a thousand were captured.  Guadalcanal together
with Midway were really the turning of the tide of the Pacific War.
At Guadalcanal the Americans proved the Japanese could make mistakes
and could be beaten.  Victory is usually the result of a combination
of skill and luck.  And at Guadalcanal the American forces could feel
they had defeated the Japanese through genuine military skill unlike
at Midway where the Japanese were beaten not as much by the Allies and
much more by an incredible run of really bad luck.  But these two
great Japanese losses really sealed the fate of the Japanese in the
Pacific War.

Author
Christian Pyle
The television ads for "The Thin Red Line" promise "images you'll never be able
to shake."  Thankfully, that blurb is hyperbole (psychological scars are not
something I'm looking for in a movie experience), but the line from the ads
suggests a collection of powerful fragments, which is what "Red Line" offers.
"The Thin Red Line," based on a novel by James Jones, marks the return of
writer/director Terrence Malick after a twenty-year absence.  Malick's previous
works as a director-"Badlands" (1973) and "Days of Heaven" (1978)-still garner
the praise of critics.  Several Hollywood stars (including George Clooney, John
Travolta, Woody Harrelson, and John Cusack) took small roles in "Red Line" just
for the opportunity of working with Malick.
The movie is about the effort to drive the Japanese out of Guadalcanal in World
War II.  It's an ensemble piece with a variety of characters, each dealing with
the horrors of war in his own way.  There's no clear protagonist or linear plot
development, but these may not be faults-war doesn't have a protagonist or a
plot.  Malick explores the psychological and philosophical aspects of war, the
latter in voice-overs in which various characters muse about the meaning of it
all.  
There is brilliance in this movie-powerful images, intense performances,
thought-provoking confrontations-but the accumulation of beautifully-crafted
fragments never melts together into a coherent whole.  This lack of cohesion is
probably due to contradictory desires for what the movie should express.  The
desire to represent the scope of war by painting a large canvas competes with
the desire to explore the psychologies of individual characters in depth.  The
viewer has trouble remembering who's who, and the size of the roster leaves
little time, even in a three-hour movie, to develop the characters clearly. 
The desire to pose philosophical questions raised by war competes with the
desire to capture the intensity of combat.  The voice-overs suggest a lyrical
repose where characters can muse on the why's of war, but the characters live
in constant danger.
So, we are left with a pile of fine pieces.  "Red Line" begins with deserter
Pvt. Witt (Jim Caviezel) enjoying a separate peace with island natives whose
simple lives centered around family and community contrast with the war. 
Later, pulled back into the war, Witt wanders through another native village
and sees a collection of human skulls.  The war in these Pacific islands is a
siege of paradise.  The scenery the soldiers plod through is breathtakingly
beautiful and tranquil, a powerful contrast to the machinery of war.
Many of the most dramatic moments occur as Charlie Company crawls up a grassy
hill to attack the Japanese machine gun nest hidden above.  The camera gives us
a soldier's perspective, crouching in the mud, unable to see through the
surrounding grass.  Explosions burst nearby, appearing suddenly and seemingly
at random.  Machine-gun fire crackles ahead.  Malick draws us into the terror
of war for soldiers who are like us, ordinary Joes plucked out of their
ordinary peacetime lives.
Their leaders, too, are unused to combat.  Halfway up the hill, Capt. Staros
(Elias Koteas), a lawyer in civilian life, refuses to advance for fear that his
men will all be slaughtered.  Staros' refusal draws his commander, Col. Tall
(Nick Nolte), closer to the fray.  Tall is an aging West Point graduate who's
been passed over for promotion.  This is his first war, and he is eager to
prove himself.  The two men play off of each other-Staros, unwilling to
sacrifice any man's life no matter how important the objective; Tall, can see
only the objective and is puzzled by the concern that Staros and Capt. Gaff
(John Cusack) have for their men.
The conflict between Tall and his captains is parallel to a conflict between
Sgt. Welsh (Sean Penn) and Witt.  Penn gives the most compelling and complex
performance of the movie, and Welsh is a fascinating mixture of cynicism and
heroism.  Other performances are considerably weaker, particularly the cameos
by Clooney and Travolta.
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Author
Steve Rhodes
Where's a ruthless studio head when you need one?
Most of the time, avid moviegoers search out the showing of the
director's cuts of movies.  Writer and director Terrence Malick's THE
THIN RED LINE, based on the James Jones novel, will have many wishing in
vain for a vastly trimmed down and focused studio cut of the picture.
At two and three quarter hours long, the movie meanders throughout but
not nearly as bad as in the relatively pointless first and last acts.
The movie might be a candidate for the record book in that it is perhaps
the first movie that would be improved if viewers skipped the entire
first and last half-hours, when little of consequence occurs.
As the year's other movie about World War II, THE THIN RED LINE will
naturally be compared to Steven Spielberg's masterpiece, SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN.  Whereas Spielberg's film is never less than breathtaking,
Malick's vision is much more ethereal and removed.  People die horribly
in both films, but Malick's movie, with its montage of helmeted
Hollywood stars, knows how to create striking visuals but not compelling
characters.  Deaths in THE THIN RED LINE are likely to leave audiences
dry-eyed and detached.
Nature, on the other hand, is so gorgeously presented that the film
looks like a long episode from The Nature Channel.  The camera looks
long and lovingly at all of the flora and fauna.  (The movie was filmed
in the beautiful Daintree rain forest of Australia.)
The biggest difference between the two movies is that SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN has a plot.  THE THIN RED LINE contents itself with showing some of
the fighting at the battle of Guadalcanal and doesn't feel the need for
any structure.
The actors are hard to recognize under all the grime of war, but from
the credits it is obvious that any man with Hollywood connections tried
to get himself a part.  Cameos by John Travolta and George Clooney
bracket the movie at the beginning and end.  In between a host of stars
drop by the set to act their parts.
Most notable perhaps are Sean Penn as 1st Sgt. Edward Welsh and Nick
Nolte as Lt. Col. Gordon Tall.  Penn's performance is as beautifully
understated as Nolte's excellent work is purposely over the top.   Nolte
plays an old soldier whose problem is that up until WW II he hasn't had
a war in his 15 years in the service, so he wants to make the most of
this one and hopefully win his general's star.  If this means that he
has to place his men needlessly in harm's way, then so be it, since this
is war after all.
In the supporting cast, John Cusack does a nice turn as Capt. John Gaff.
The captain is a hero who wears his garland of victory heavily.
Malick makes extensive use of voice-over for the characters to express
their inner thoughts.  Some of these are moving, but too often they end
up sounding trite and false.
Even if it drags frequently, the movie does illustrate the horrors of
war.  "Who's doing this?" one of the grunts asks.  "Who's killing us?"
The film asks the quintessential anti-war question of "Why?" but
provides few hints at the answers.
THE THIN RED LINE runs needlessly long at 2:46.  It is rated R for
wartime violence and gore and would be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Stephen Sills
Rated R (war violence, strong language, some nudity and sexual themes)
I have to admit that I disliked this film initially. It certianly isn't for
every taste, and it's sheer torture to sit through if you're in a restless
mood. That said, if you ARE in the right mood, it's absolutely incredible. This
was my second favorite movie of 1998, and would have been a shoo-in for first
in almost any other year.
Perhaps the big turn-off for many was this film's unconventionality. I'd be
hard-pressed to compare it to any other film that I've seen - it is very, very
artsy, incredibly slow - and amazingly, it works beautifully. 
On my second viewing, I realized that the film follows the Three Act structure
(I didn't think it had any sort of structure at all when I first saw it). The
first act serves to set up the characters - sort of. It exists even moreso to
set a mood of tension and restlesness, and perhaps even feelings of boredom.
And then it is shattered by the intense violence of the second (which
encompasses most of the movie). The majority of the film is one extended battle
scene, intercut with brief flashbacks and voice-overs. The artsier elements do
not detract from the action, but add to it - they succeed in briefly letting
the viewer peek into the minds of the soldiers, only to be suddenly yanked back
into reality when the battle resumes.
The battle scenes are amazing (second only to "Saving Private Ryan" in my
opinion). They're brutal, horrifying, and at times beautiful due to the amazing
cinematography. The second act is as immersive, brilliant, and haunting as any
film that I have ever seen.
The only problems come during the first and third acts. Malick takes a little
too long to get the film started. Although the initial scenes - which consist
of two soldiers' experiencing a near-eden-like paradise while going AWOL, and
the preperations for battle - are effective and necessary, hints of
pretentiousness sink in. The film is just a tad too artsy near the beginning,
and a lot of people that disliked the movie probably gave up on it because of
this.
The final act is effective at winding the film down, but the problems from the
first persist - it's a bit too long, and comes over as pretentious at times.
That said, there are two sequences (one where a soldier gets a devastating note
from his wife, and another where one of the main characters is killed) that are
nothing short of incredible. 
The performances are phenominal all around. The two standouts are Nick Nolte
and newcomer Jim Caviezel, both of whom should have been nominated for Oscars.
Nolte is riveting and intense as the colonel in charge of the operation. His
character is hard, mean, and somewhat reckless with the lives of his men, and
yet Nolte somehow manages to evoke sympathy for him. Caviezel is forever
questioning the nature of war, his place in it, and if there's any deeper
meaning to the hell that he's going through. He is absolutely perfect -
genuine, sympathetic, sincere, and yet strong when he needs to be. Although
restricted to a relatively small role, Sean Penn is also very good as the
company's pessimistic seargent.
As to how it stacks up to "Saving Private Ryan" - it was my second favorite
movie of 1998, "Ryan" was my first. It's really hard to compare the two - they
are so, so different - so I won't, beyond saying that Spielberg's film had more
of an impact on me. However, the two are comparable from the standpoint of
quality (I can easily see why someone would "The Thin Red Line" above "Ryan). I
highly recommend both of them, and consider them to be the two best war movies
ever made.
All in all, "The Thin Red Line" is filmmaking of an incredibly high order. It's
slight faults are easily offset by the sheer brilliance of what is done right.
It's a real shame that it tanked at the box office - films this unconventional,
powerful, and thought-provoking don't come along very often.

Author
Ryan Davis
        It was hard to watch a World War II film without comparing it to
Spielburg's epic `Saving Private Ryan.' Since both films were released in
1998 and both dealt with the horror of war, comparison is unavoidable. While
`A Thin Red Line' is a solid film that has some strong features, it doesn't
touch the audience like SPR did.
        The plot is very loosely strung together; it's like the camera just
follows around a group of soldiers. Sgt. Edward Welsh (Sean Penn) is a tough
as nails career soldier; war is his life. Capt. James 'Bugger' Staros (Elias
Koteas) is a captain who refuses to risk the lives of his troops,
unnecessarily. Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (Nick Nolte) is a officer, who has been
passed over so many times for general that he sees the war as his last chance
at earning his stars. The list could go on and on, but most of the characters
are in and out of the picture so fast you won't even get attached to any of
them. There are also tons of cameos from stars, like John Travolta to George
Clooney.
        That is the main problem with `A Thin Red Line', lack of character
development. There are just too many characters. Since we don't know anyone
well enough to care about them, we don't care what happens to them in the end.
There are other weaknesses as well, including running time and narration. `A
Thin Red Line' is way too long, or maybe it's just the fact that it runs
forever without any development. Then there are the endless voiceovers by at
least four different characters. This becomes tiresome, really quickly.
        Not just to focus just on flaws, `A Thin Red Line' is still an above
average film. It's chock-full of great performances, with the leading standout
being Nick Nolte's Oscar worthy performance.  Also the cinematography is just
beautiful and the battle scenes are outstanding.
        While `A Thin Red Line' isn't the masterpiece that `Saving Private
Ryan' was, it is still a worthwhile film. If you have a good amount of time
and you don't mind spending it in the theater, check it out.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    
